

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/J._Robert_Oppenheimer#Security_hearing

https://newrepublic.com/article/63602/now-we-know

https://www.wilsoncenter.org/publication/was-oppenheimer-soviet-spy-roundtable-discussion


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZuRvBoLu4t0

Wipes his eye but there is no tear


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xSG_G5CVVlM

none of these people are like Oppenheimer, who I guess was some kind of high-level Soviet spy

something off about that guy


likes philosophy

some called him "arrogant"


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xSG_G5CVVlM

around 8:30

says he was meeting with Gerorge Kennan about a "very odd episode" "maybe tragic" about "what exactly the Americans were doing" during the Russian revolution and the year after it

(what were they doing?)

going to be "quite a yarn" once he gets it finished 

Kennan published?


worth noting: Oppenheimer came up with nuclear non-proliferation and Kennan with containment theory which, whether right ideas or not, were key reasons for U.S. to get involved in wars for past 70 years



around 12:30

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/McCarran_Internal_Security_Act

McCarran act was some act that made it so Communists have to register with AG

Oppenheimer says we're "rightly ashamed" by the McCarran act, says its hurting science



around 16:00

talking poetically about "terror" of discovery, kindof weird


23:17


good point about secrecy

asking "are we making the right decision?" if made by secretive people


"there aren't any secrets of nature, there are secrets of the intenions of men"



https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/robert-oppenheimer-documentary/
	"The open society, the unrestricted access to knowledge, the unplanned and uninhibited association of men for its furtherance—these are what may make a vast, complex, ever-growing, ever-changing, ever more specialized and expert technological world nevertheless a world of human community."



did he believe that?


https://www.huffingtonpost.com/auctionata/j-robert-oppenheimer-the-_b_9790114.html
	There are lessons to be learned by studying the lives of important 20th century nuclear scientists, such as Oppenheimer. When General Groves appointed Oppenheimer to head the Manhattan Project’s secret weapons laboratory, he did so against the advice of others. Groves saw that Oppenheimer’s relentless ambition and vast scientific knowledge outweighed any concerns over left leaning politics. In his youth, Oppenheimer infamously preferred physics to friendship. Then, after World War II, he expressed genuine remorse for the deaths brought about by his work. How do we reconcile such a scientist with the man?


from interviews and history sounded like he was always (mostly) open about his politics, pointing toward him really believing it


	...Tolman was ten years older than Oppenheimer when they met. She was a brilliant mind and a warm hearted person. Though Oppenheimer had just few close personal relationships, Tolman’s ability to penetrate the minds of others broke through to Oppenheimer. It is no wonder that Tolman was also the first woman elected to the council of the Society for the Psychological Study of Social Issues and a clinical psychologist with the Office of Strategic Services (OSS) - the basis for the modern day Central Intelligence Agency (CIA). It was while working with the OSS that Tolman and Oppenheimer’s relationship began. Tolman’s government position and her closeness to other members of the Manhattan Project gave her a unique insight into Oppenheimer’s moral conundrum. Tolman witnessed her husband’s and her lover’s excitement when the now infamous “Trinity” test explosion was successful. 


hmm



here's a thought:


would they want to actually recruit Oppenheimer? most people who learn what they are end up immediately going to work to destroy them

Oppenheimer was sharp, well-connected and (tenetively) well-meaning, so he would be a threat to them if he knew too much.


https://www.reddit.com/r/UnresolvedMysteries/comments/4aqxbo/historical_the_strange_death_of_jean_tatlock_j/

something going on with Tatlock?


I.F. Stone lamented that "the cunning" have more power in the world than scientists. Maybe Oppenheimer an instance of this playing out? Stone was an oppenheimer contempoary

it does make sense in a way that those who know people have more power over people than those who know physics

Tatlock would be one of those, being a psychiatrist


...

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/J._Robert_Oppenheimer#Security_hearing
	Rather than consistently oppose the "Red-baiting" of the late 1940s and early 1950s, Oppenheimer testified against some of his former colleagues and students, both before and during his hearing. In one incident, his damning testimony against former student Bernard Peters was selectively leaked to the press. Historians have interpreted this as an attempt by Oppenheimer to please his colleagues in the government and perhaps to divert attention from his own previous left-wing ties and those of his brother. In the end it became a liability when it became clear that if Oppenheimer had really doubted Peters' loyalty, his recommending him for the Manhattan Project was reckless, or at least contradictory.


Oppenheimer testified against some of his colleagues, I guess in spy and/or communist witch-hunt investigation



http://beck2.med.harvard.edu/week12/oppenheimer.pdf
	Damning testimony against Peters, in which Robert labeled him “a dangerous man and quite Red,” was leaked to the Rochester Times- Union newspaper and threatened Peters’s job the University of Rochester. Oppenheimer’s testimony angered many of his peers, not to mention Peters, who was surprised by what he saw as gross inaccuracies. Moreover, if the leaked testimony was truly representative of Oppenheimer’s feelings towards Peters at the time, what did it say about Oppenheimer’s judgment that he had kept Peters on the Manhattan Project until 1946? Robert later said that the testimony was a terrible mistake and that he was not prepared to answer the questions when they were asked. He wrote a letter to the editor of the another Rochester newspaper, suggesting that while Peters did have radical political views during his years as a student, “I have never known Dr. Peters to commit a dishonorable act, nor a disloyal one.” Peters’s job remained secure, but afterwards his foreign travel was extremely restricted.


Peters was Oppenheimer's student, Oppenheimer testified he was "a dangerous man and quite Red"



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oppenheimer_security_hearing
	Many of Oppenheimer's associates in the years before World War II were Communist Party USA members. They included his wife Kitty, whose first husband Joe Dallet had been killed fighting with the Lincoln Battalion in the Spanish Civil War; his brother Frank Oppenheimer and Frank's wife Jackie; and his girlfriend Jean Tatlock.[14] One of his Communist associates was a colleague at the University of California, an assistant professor of French literature named Haakon Chevalier. The two had met during a rally for Spanish Loyalists, and had co-founded a branch of the American Federation of Teachers at Berkeley known as Local 349.[1] The Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) had opened a file on Oppenheimer in March 1941, after he had attended a December 1940 meeting at Chevalier's home that was also attended by the Communist Party's California state secretary William Schneiderman and its treasurer Isaac Folkoff, both of whom were targets of FBI surveillance and wiretaps. Agents had recorded the license plate of Oppenheimer's car. The FBI noted that Oppenheimer was on the Executive Committee of the American Civil Liberties Union, which it considered a Communist front. Shortly thereafter, the FBI added Oppenheimer to its Custodial Detention Index, for arrest in case of national emergency.[15][16]


a lot of Oppenheimer's associates--brother, his wife, Opennheimer's wife, girlfriend and colleagues were communists

worked with Chevalier, co-founded something with him

went to secret communist meeting that FBI was spying on

Oppenheier made it to "so dangerous needs to be arrested in event of war" list


	In January or February 1943, Chevalier had a brief conversation with Oppenheimer in the kitchen of his home. Chevalier told Oppenheimer that there was a scientist, George Eltenton, who could transmit information of a technical nature to the Soviet Union.[17] Oppenheimer rejected the overture, but failed to report it until August 1943, when he volunteered to Manhattan Project security officers that three men at Berkeley had been solicited for nuclear secrets on behalf of the Soviet Union, by a person he did not know who worked for Shell Oil, and who had Communist connections. He gave that person's name as George Eltenton. When pressed on the issue in later interviews at Los Alamos in December 1943 with Groves, who promised to keep the identity of the three men from the FBI, Oppenheimer identified the contact who had approached him as Chevalier, and told Groves that only one person had been approached: his brother Frank.[18] Groves considered Oppenheimer too important to the ultimate Allied goals of building atomic bombs and winning the war to oust him over this suspicious behavior. He ordered that Oppenheimer be given a security clearance "without delay, irrespective of the information which you have concerning Mr. Oppenheimer. He is absolutely essential to the project."[19]


A Soviet agent told Oppenheimer there was a scientist that could help him transmit nuclear secrets to the Soviet union. Oppenheimer didn't tell anyone until his security interview for Manhatten project. Gave the name of the scientist but not Chevalier. Misled about Chavelier, saying he was a "person he did not know."

Groves promosied not to reveal name to FBI, and Oppenheimer told Groves about Chavelier, but only said it was his brother who was approached

sounds like Oppenheimer wanted to keep a secret

Groves was like "OK good enough"

maybe this could be blackmail on Oppenheimer?


	Oppenheimer was interviewed by the FBI on September 5, 1946. He related the "Chevalier incident", and he gave contradictory and equivocating statements, telling government agents that only he had been approached, by Chevalier, who at the time had supposedly said that he had a potential conduit through Eltenton for information which could be passed to the Soviets. Oppenheimer claimed to have invented the other contacts to conceal the identity of Chevalier, whose identity he believed would be immediately apparent if he named only one contact, but whom he believed to be innocent of any disloyalty. The 1943 fabrication and the shifting nature of his accounts figured prominently in the 1954 inquiry.[20][21]


lied about it to FBI?


	...Borden's letter stated as follows:

	    This opinion considers the following factors, among others.

	    1. The evidence indicating that as of April 1942: (a) He was contributing substantial monthly sums to the Communist Party; (b) His ties with communism had survived the Nazi-Soviet Pact and the Soviet attack upon Finland; (c) His wife and younger brother were Communists; (d) He had no close friends except Communists; (e) He had at least one Communist mistress; (f) He belonged only to Communist organizations, apart from professional affiliations; (g) The people whom he recruited into the early wartime Berkeley atom project were exclusively Communists; (h) He had been instrumental in securing recruits for the Communist Party, and (i) He was in frequent contact with Soviet Espionage agents.

	    2. The evidence indicating that: (a) In May 1942, he either stopped contributing funds to the Communist Party or else made his contributions though a new channel not yet discovered; (b) In April 1943 his name was formally submitted for security clearance; (c) He himself was aware at the time that his name had been so submitted and (d) He thereafter repeatedly gave false information to General Groves, Manhattan District, and the FBI concerning the 1939 – April 1942 period.

	    3. The evidence indicating that: (a) He was responsible for employing a number of Communists, some of them not technical, at wartime Los Alamos; (b) He selected one such individual to write the official Los Alamos history; (c) He was a vigorous supporter of the H-bomb program until August 6, 1945, (Hiroshima), on which day he personally urged each senior individual working in this field to desist; and (d) He was an enthusiastic sponsor of the A-bomb program until the war ended, when he immediately and outspokenly advocated the Los Alamos Laboratory be disbanded.

	    4. The evidence indicating that: (a) He was remarkably instrumental in influencing the military authorities and the Atomic Energy Commission essentially to suspend H-bomb development from mid-1946 through January 31, 1950 [the date of President Truman's public announcement that the United States, in answer to the new Soviet atomic bomb, would seek to build an H-bomb] (b) He has worked tirelessly, from January 31, 1950, onward to retard the United States H-bomb program; (c) He has used his potent influence against every postwar effort to expand capacity for producing A-bomb material; (d) He has used his potent influence against every postwar effort directed at obtaining larger supplies of uranium raw material; and (e) He has used his potent influence against every major postwar effort toward atomic power development, including the nuclear-powered submarine and aircraft programs as well as industrial power projects.[49]

	The letter also pointed out that Oppenheimer had worked against development of the hydrogen bomb, and had worked against postwar atomic energy development, including nuclear power plants and nuclear submarines. The letter concluded:

	    1. Between 1939 and mid-1942, more probably than not, J. Robert Oppenheimer was a sufficiently hardened Communist that he either volunteered espionage information to the Soviets or complied with a request for such information. (This includes the possibility that when he singled out the weapons aspect of atomic development as his personal speciality, he was acting under Soviet instructions.) 2. More probably than not, he has since been functioning as an espionage agent; and 3. More probably than not, he has since acted under a Soviet directive in influencing United States military, atomic energy, intelligence, and diplomatic policy.[50]


sounds like he was a Soviet agent


	...Oppenheimer testified for a total of 27 hours. His demeanor was far different than it had been in his previous interrogations, such as his appearance before the House Un-American Activities. Under cross-examination by Robb, who had access to top-secret information such as surveillance recordings, Oppenheimer was "often anguished, sometimes surprisingly inarticulate, frequently apologetic about his past and even self-castigating."[62]


that doesn't exactly sounds like a Soviet agent...

I guess I'm used to Soviet agents being smooth talking con-artists

a stereotypical scientist working for Soviets would have different motivations and Soviets would have different ways at getting at them I guess


	...One of the key elements in this hearing was Oppenheimer's earliest testimony about Eltenton's approach to various Los Alamos scientists, a story that Oppenheimer confessed he had fabricated to protect his friend Chevalier. Unknown to Oppenheimer, both versions were recorded during his interrogations of a decade before, and he was surprised on the witness stand with transcripts that he had no chance to review. Under questioning by Robb, he admitted that he had lied to Boris Pash, an Army counterintelligence officer, concerning the approach from Chevalier. Asked why he had fabricated a story that three people had been approached for espionage, Oppenheimer responded, "Because I was an idiot."[63]


a guess: maybe Oppenheimer actually considered Chavelier his friend, panicked and wanted to protect him, then Soviets got blackmail on Oppenheimer? and maybe Chavlier wasn't actually so much a "friend"...


	Oppenheimer's clearance was revoked by a 2–1 vote of the panel. Gray and Morgan voted in favor, Evans against. The board rendered its decision on May 27, 1954, in a 15,000-word letter to Nichols. It found that 20 of the 24 charges were either true or substantially true. The board found that while he had been opposed to the bomb and that his lack of enthusiasm for it had affected the attitude of other scientists, he had not actively discouraged scientists from working on the H-bomb, as had been alleged in Nichols' letter. It found that "there is no evidence that he was a member of the [Communist] party in the strict sense of the word," and concluded that he is a "loyal citizen". It said that he "had a high degree of discretion, reflecting an unusual ability to keep to himself vital secrets," but that he had "a tendency to be coerced, or at least influenced in conduct, for a period of years."[77]

	The board found that Oppenheimer's association with Chevalier "is not the kind of thing that our security system permits on the part of one who customarily has access to information of the highest classification", and concluded that "Oppenheimer's continuing conduct reflects a serious disregard for the requirements of the security system," that he was susceptible "to influence which could have serious implications for the security interests of the country," that his attitude toward the H-bomb program raised doubt about whether his future participation "would be consistent with the best interests of security," and that Oppenheimer had been "less than candid in several instances" in his testimony. The majority therefore did not recommend that his security clearance be reinstated.[78]


board concluded "loyal citizen" but that Soviets had influence and ability to coerce him


	...The charges were outlined in a letter from Kenneth D. Nichols, general manager of the AEC. Pending resolution of the charges, Oppenheimer's security clearance was suspended. Oppenheimer told Strauss that some of what was in Nichols' letter was correct, some incorrect.[53][54]

	...In a harshly worded memorandum to the AEC on June 12, 1954, Nichols recommended that Oppenheimer's security clearance not be reinstated. In five "security findings", Nichols said that Oppenheimer was "a Communist in every sense except that he did not carry a party card," and that the Chevalier incident indicated that Oppenheimer "is not reliable or trustworthy", and that his misstatements might have represented criminal conduct. He said that Oppenheimer's "obstruction and disregard for security" showed "a consistent disregard of a reasonable security system." The Nichols memorandum was not made public nor provided to Oppenheimer's lawyers, who were not allowed to appear before the AEC.[80]


something up with Nichols? maybe going too far, politicizing it


...


https://news.google.com/newspapers?nid=888&dat=19540416&id=2l9SAAAAIBAJ&sjid=ZXoDAAAAIBAJ&pg=4664,7617&hl=en

St Petersburg Times quoted scientist Cordon allegeing Oppenheimer testified on Peters to "turn informer" to avoid "Red charges"


...


https://www.nytimes.com/2014/10/12/us/transcripts-kept-secret-for-60-years-bolster-defense-of-oppenheimers-loyalty.html

https://www.osti.gov/opennet/hearing.jsp

a lot of his testimony released 3 years ago, says bolstered that he was not a soviet agent


board conclusion sounds right from other info: he had communist sympathies and soviets had influence and blackmail over him

there are hints of Oppenheimer disliking Soviets and certain communists like Peters who he called "dangerous" (story there?)

guy wasn't a dummy and would be able to see Soviets massacring people, doesn't come off as horribly evil, doesn't come off as type Soviets would think they could get to buy into their plan (contrast with Kevin Fu and maybe Feynenman)

small hints so far that it was Soviets who outed him and started the hearing


...


https://www.osti.gov/includes/opennet/includes/Oppenheimer%20hearings/Vol%20I%20Oppenheimer.pdf

pg 151

	"Let ma mention one or two pointe. One, to my mind tbe principal one, was that it wae clear that no aeoure a:vstem could be developed for protectine people against tbe abuse of atOll:l.c -apou, unle•s tbe world were open to aooe•, unl••• it was poaaible to :l.nd out tbe relevant facts eve17-Wbere in the world which had to do with tbe aeo1U'ity of the rest of tbe world. Tbi• notion of opeUDeas, of an open world, la, of course, relevant to other aspects of tbe Soviet ayetem. It 1• doubtful whether, without the newly terrible, yet archaic, apparatus of the Iron Curtain, a government like theSoviet GoverDlllBnt could exist. It is doubtful whether the abuses of that governmant could persist." 

	..."It should not be beyond human ingenuity for ua to devise less friendly proposals. We need aot here detail the maay reason wby they have not been put forward, wby it has appeared irrelevant and grotesque to do so. 'l'bese reasons range from the special difficulties of all negotia-tion with the Soviet Union, through the peculiar oblltacles presented by tbe programmatic hostility and tbs institutional-ized secretiveness of Conmuaist countries, to what 11ay be regarded as tbe more normal and familiar difficulties of devising instruments for tbe regulation of armaments in a world witbout prospect of political settlement. 

	"Instead we oameto grips, or bepa to come to grips, with the massive evidences of Soviet bostility and tbe growing evidences of Soviet power, and with the many al1110St inevitable, yet often tragic, elements of weakness, disharmony and disunity in what we have leared to call the Free World." 


sounds like he knew a lot of what was going on with the Soviets

and he must have known some of the people he was in contact with were Soviet agents (like Chavalier incident) so he'd have first hand experience with how their espionage works




...


http://www.newsweek.com/hiroshima-smouldered-our-atom-bomb-scientists-suffered-remorse-360125
	As the facts of the destruction of Hiroshima and Nagasaki ﬁltered back to Los Alamos in August and September, the earlier exuberance of the Manhattan Project’s scientists and engineers turned introspective and, by stages, morose. Some found themselves reﬂecting guiltily on what they had done.

	...In J. Robert Oppenheimer we encounter a man who seemed to reﬂect the median temperament, rather like a psychic bellwether who captures the emotional impulses of those around him. On 16 October, his last day on the “Hill,” Los Alamos held a farewell ceremony in Oppenheimer’s honor.

	...“It is our hope,” Oppenheimer said, “that in years to come we may look at this scroll, and all that it signiﬁes, with pride. Today that pride must be tempered with a profound concern. If atomic bombs are to be added as new weapons to the arsenals of a warring world, or to the arsenals of nations preparing for war, then the time will come when mankind will curse the names of Los Alamos and of Hiroshima.

	“The peoples of this world must unite or they will perish. This war, that has ravaged so much of the earth, has written these words. The atomic bomb has spelled them out for all men to understand. Other men have spoken them, in other times, of other wars, of other weapons. They have not prevailed. There are some, misled by a false sense of human history, who hold that they will not prevail today. It is not for us to believe that. By our works we are committed, to a united world, before this common peril, in law, and in humanity.”



...


http://www.americanrhetoric.com/speeches/robertoppenheimeratomicbomb.htm
	delivered 16 November 1945, University of Pennsylvania, PA

	...Atomic weapons are based on things that are in the very frontier of physics. Their development is inextricably entangled with the growth of physics, as in all probability with that of the biological sciences and many practical arts. Atomic weapons were actually made by scientists; even some of you may think by scientists normally committed to the exploration of rather recondite things.

	The speed of the development, the active and essential participation of men of science in the development, have no doubt contributed greatly to our awareness of the crisis that faces us, even to our sense of responsibility for its resolution. But these are contingent things.

	What is not contingent is that we have made a thing, a most terrible weapon, that has altered abruptly and profoundly the nature of the world. We have made a thing that, by all standards of the world we grew up in, is an evil thing. By so doing, by our participation in making it possible to make these things, we have raised again the question of whether science is good for man, of whether it is good to learn about the world, to try to understand it, to try to control it, to help gift to the world of men increased insight, increased power.

	Because we are scientists, we must say an unalterable "yes" to these questions. It is our faith and our commitment, seldom made explicit, even more seldom challenged that knowledge is a good in itself. Knowledge and such power as must come with it.

	One will perhaps think back to the early days of physical science in Western culture, when it was felt as so deep a threat to the whole Christian world. One will remember the more recent times of the last century, where such a threat was seen by some in the new understanding of the relations between man and the rest of the living world. One may even remember the concern among the learned, that some of the fundamental developments of physics; the theory of relativity, and even more, the ideas of complementarity and their far-reaching implications on the relations of common sense and of scientific discovery, their enforced reminder, familiar to Hindu culture but rather foreign to that of Europe, of the latent inadequacies of human conceptions to the real world they must describe.

	One may think of these things, and especially of the great conflicts of the Renaissance, because they reflect the truth that science is a part of the world of men; that often before it has injected into that world, elements of instability and change, that if there is peril in the situation today -- as I believe there is -- we may look to the past for reassurance that our faith in the value of knowledge could prevail.


points to history to say knowledge always good for man and shouldn't be afraid of science

I guess knowledge of how nuclear bombs work a good thing, building thousands of them not so much...

a better way to frame it: should you invent nuclear bombs when you know the people who are going to be in charge of using them will use them right away? if they're misanthropic? if they'll use them to blackmail the world?

then the answer more complicated, depends on the power of misanthropes and what the rest of the world will do to stop them


Oppenheimer's answer is similar to Katabi's: "knowledge is a good in itself." She said in an interview it's up to scientists to figure out new technologies, and everyone else on how to use them (roughly).


	An atomic bomb is not a new conception, a new discovery of reality. It is a very ordinary thing in some ways, compact with much of the science that makes our laboratories and our industry. But it will change men’s lives as over the centuries, the knowledge of the solar system has changed them. For in a world of atomic weapons, wars will cease.


maybe didn't completely understand Soviets


	... But it is a weapon for aggressors, and the elements of surprise and of terror are as intrinsic to it as are the fissionable nuclei. One of our colleagues, a man most deeply committed to the welfare and the growth of science, advised me not long ago not to give too much weight in any public words, to the terrors of atomic weapons as they are, and as they can be.

	He knows as well as any of us, how much more terrible they can be made. It might, he said, cause a reaction hostile to science. It might turn people away from science. He is not such an old man, and I think it will make little difference to him, or to any of us, what is said now about atomic weapons if before we die, we live to see a war in which they are used.


someone told Oppenheimer to not in public talk about terror of nuclear war since it might hurt science

Oppenheimer disagreed

(who was that person?)


	... If I return so insistently to the magnitude of the peril, not only to science but to our civilization, it is because I see in that our one great hope as a further argument against war, like arguments that have always and increasingly existed, that have grown with the gradual growth of modern technology, it is not unique.


Oppenheimer ignored that person and spoke publicly of terror of nuclear weapons because he wanted to stop wars

interesting that one of Nichols charges against Oppenheimer was "trying to hurt H-bomb project"

having HUAC hit him with that might help politicize it? there is a steroetype of cold-warrior type right wingers around 50's being crazy nuclear bomb pyromaniacs (see movie "Dr. Strangelove" or videogame "Fallout")

it sounds like Oppenheimer was opposing Soviets in this speech


	... It has proven most difficult to make those changes in the relations between nations and peoples. Those concurrent and mutually dependent changes in law, in spirit, in customs and in conception; they’re all essential. No one of them is absolutely prior to the others that should make an end to war. It has not only been difficult, it has proven impossible. It will be difficult in the days ahead, difficult and beset with discouragements and frustrations, and it will be very slow, but it will not be impossible.


Oppenheimer wanted peoples attitudes to change about war, or change the attitudes that lead to war


	If it is recognized as I think it should be recognized, that this for us in our time is the fundamental problem of human society, and it will not be impossible. These are very major commitments, nor would I minimize their depth, for they involve holding prior to all else we cherish all that we would live for and die for. Our common bond with all people everywhere, our common responsibility for a world without war, our common confidence that in a world thus united, the things that we cherish, learning and freedom and humanity, will not be lost.

	These words may seem visionary, but they are not meant so. It is a practical thing to avert atomic war. It is a practical thing to recognize the fraternity of the peoples of the world. It is a practical thing to recognize as a common responsibility, wholly incapable of unilateral solution, the completely common peril that atomic weapons constitutes for the world. To recognize that only by community of responsibility is there any hope of meeting that peril.


you may say I'm a dreamer, but I'm not... actually a dreamer it's actually very practical


	For this is a new field, less fettered than most with vested interest, or with the vast inertia of centuries of purely national sovereignty. This is a new field growing out of a science inspired by the highest ideals of international fraternity. It would seem somewhat visionary and more than a little dangerous to hope that work on atomic energy and atomic weapons might proceed, as have so many things in the past. Like the building of battleships on a purely and narrowly national authority, without basic confidence between peoples, without cooperation or the abrogation that somehow these separate, distrustful atomic arsenals would make for the peace of the world.

	It would seem to me visionary in the extreme, and not practical, to hope that methods which have so sadly failed to avert war in the past, will succeed in the face of this far graver peril. It would, in my opinion, be most dangerous to regard, in these shattering times, a radical solution as less practical than a conventional one. It would also be most dangerous and most certain to lead to tragic discouragements to expect that a radical solution can evolve rapidly, or that its evolution will be free of the gravest conflicts and uncertainties.

	The first steps in implementing the internationalization of responsibility, of responsibility perhaps in the first instance for averting the perils of an atomic war, will inevitably be very modest. It is surely not proper for me, who have neither experience nor knowledge, to speak of what such steps might be.


I think he's saying atomic weapons would be a practical means to avert war


	... It is not at all as a species; it is rather a concrete and constructive, if limited, form of those relations of cooperation among nations which must be the pattern of the future. Let me say again, these remarks are not intended in any way to define or exhaust the content of any international arrangements it may be possible or appropriate to make, nor to limit them. They are offered as suggestions that occur naturally to a scientist who would wish to be helpful. But they leave quite untouched, the basic problems of statesmanship on which all else depends.


idea that nuclear weapons would force nations to cooperate?

that did happen with all those nuclear weapons treaties


oh man

this is why he gave nuclear secrets to the Soviets, isn't it?

I mean if he did...


	It seems to me that these reactions among scientists that have caused them to meet and speak and testify and write and wrangle without remission, and that are general almost to the point of universality, reflect -- correctly reflect an awareness of unparalleled crisis. It is a crisis because not only the preferences and tastes of scientists are in jeopardy, but the substance of their faith; the general recognition of the value, the unqualified value of knowledge, of scientific power and progress.

	Whatever the individual motivation and belief of the scientist, without that recognition from his fellow men of the value of his work, in the long term, science will perish. I do not believe that it will be possible to transcend the present crisis in a world in which the works of science are being used, that they’re being knowingly used for ends men hold evil.

	In such a world, it will be of little help to try to protect the scientist from restraints, from controls, from an imposed secrecy which he rightly finds incompatible with all he has learned to believe and to cherish. Therefore, it does seem to me, necessary to explore somewhat the impact of the advent of atomic weapons on our fellow men, and the courses that might lie open for averting the disaster they invite.

	I think there is only one such course, and that in it lies the hope of all our futures.


he had hopes that nuclear weapons could be used for good instead of evil

was he right?

there hasn't been a nuclear war or anything like WWI or WWII since, just proxy wars

on one hand, world wars between superpowers less likely with nukes

on the other hand, a bunch of countries pointing nukes at each other while provocateures try to get them to fight probably not good for humanities odds for survival

I think he was right in that you can always try to make the most of a bad thing, try to turn a bad thing good. Nukes cut our odds but sharpen the reasons why international cooperation needed and motivate people for that.



...



http://www.newsweek.com/hiroshima-smouldered-our-atom-bomb-scientists-suffered-remorse-360125
	On 25 October 1945 President Harry S. Truman received Oppenheimer in the Oval Office; the physicist had requested the meeting in an effort to persuade the president to support international controls on nuclear weapons. Truman disarmed Oppenheimer by asking when the latter thought the Russians would develop a nuclear weapon; Oppenheimer replied that he did not know, to which Truman interjected: “Never!” 

	Sensing a lack of urgency in the U.S. leader, and perhaps a little overwhelmed by their ﬁrst meeting, Oppenheimer conﬁded, “Mr. President, I feel I have blood on my hands.” The remark infuriated Truman who bluntly replied (as he later told David Lilienthal, chairman of the Atomic Energy Commission), that “the blood is on my hands, let me worry about that,” smoothly ejected the physicist and instructed Secretary of State Dean Acheson never to bring “that son of a bitch in this office ever again.”

	Oppenheimer meant that he wore the blood of future casualties of nuclear war; not the blood of the Japanese. The “cry baby scientist,” as Truman later dismissed him (itself a rather infantile remark) cared not for the Japanese—who were “poor little people,” the collateral damage of a war they had brought on themselves; he wept for the Western victims of a future nuclear Armageddon.


something off about this article

story illustrative of quandries seen in other soviet propaganda, or dillemas that they like I guess


one: where do you assign blame? If the Okhrana take Oppenheimer's nukes and go to town nuking everyone, do you blame them or Oppenheimer? Okhrana would like you to blame Oppenheimer I think, if only because it would be funnier to them

I think this dilemma of "as a scientist am I responsible for the tech I create and how its used" might come up in a lot of the scientists they try to influence


Oppenheimer was in "constant contact" with Soviet agents and assumed nukes would be all over the world to make it an immediate problem as of his Nov 1945 speech above. story above is funny (wrong word?) in a way because Oppenheimer assumes everyone will soon have nukes while Truman has no idea


(or did he???!)


	Oppenheimer’s remark alluded to his responsibility for the deaths of millions of individuals in some distant apocalypse, which would be traced to the two nuclear bombs, nicknamed Little Boy and Fat Man. Hiroshima and Nagasaki served as terrible, if necessary, examples of what the bomb might do; he did not think of them as avoidable tragedies in their own right. He quickly cast forward—as though he dared not look back—to a world where, he dreamed, global controls on nuclear weapons would entrench a lasting peace.

	In later years he alluded to a collective sense of regret for the general horror of war. He spoke of the “numbing and indifference” World War II had imbued in mankind; he warned that “we have made a very grave mistake” in contemplating the massive use of the weapon; and that “in some sort of crude sense…the physicists have known sin.” He did not deﬁne the nature of his “sin.” Oppenheimer’s mind was impervious to the probes of an ordinary conscience. He felt a terrible responsibility for what might happen; not for what he had helped to do.


comes off as derisive of Oppenheimer, pointing to him being their dupe

could see his whole attitude on nukes as motivated reasoning to escape guilt for responsibility of creating nukes

author comes off as thinking Oppenheimer only cared about Western casualties and was weak-minded, which would help you guess what Okhrana might tell their agents about Oppenheimer in modern times


	...His acme as chairman of the powerful General Advisory Committee to the U.S. Atomic Energy Commission came tumbling down with the suspension of his security clearance in 1954: the inquiry dredged up his pre-war associations with Communists, notably his late lover Jean Tatlock and his friend Haakon Chevalier, who claimed the scientist had been a member of a Communist cell.

	The witch hunt, of course, was a “travesty of justice,” and had more to do with Oppenheimer’s refusal to support the hydrogen bomb project than any serious truck with Reds.


more pointing to author being agentura


	...If Oppenheimer lacked the moral courage directly to recognize his role in the destruction of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, the facts of the atomic bombs jolted other scientists, as if from a ﬁtful sleep, to a keener awareness of a terrible new reality.

	Many lapsed into torments of self-accusation and spent much of their lives expiating guilt. Physicist Mark Oliphant, for example—who had played a critical role in persuading the U.S. to build the bomb—“could hardly believe the early reports of the incineration of Hiroshima…for he had not really come to grips with the possibility that a civilized and reputedly Christian nation was capable of such a deed.”

	His denial was hardly credible: what on earth did he suppose he had been working on, if not a bomb that would, if the chance arose, be used? Unlike Oppenheimer, Oliphant ran the gauntlet of guilt and later damned himself: “During the war I worked…on nuclear weapons so I, too, am a war criminal.”

	Leo Szilard and members of the Franck Committee imposed, to a lesser degree, a similar self-indictment. Their consciences were less harmful, as they had persisted with their protest weeks before the nuclear destruction of the two Japanese cities.

	...James Conant, the chemist who drove the S-1 program, manifested a third expression of the scientists’ moral dilemma: pride and an utter lack of remorse were the hallmarks of Conant’s response to the atomic bombs. Conant disdained those scientists who “paraded their sense of guilt” about the bomb. The moral conﬂict over Hiroshima “hardly existed in my mind,” said the man who had led America’s mustard gas research program during World War I and played a vital role in the development of proto-napalm dropped on Japanese cities.


author says some scientists paraded their sense of guilt but Oppenheimer didn't

in a weird way him having trouble accepting guilt makes him seem more honest


	...Conant understood the gravity of a nuclear arms race; his answer was to ratchet up America’s nuclear arsenal to force concessions from the Kremlin. Within weeks of Hiroshima he advised the War Department to prepare for nuclear war. Fear of an atomic conﬂagration should not render the American public insensible or hysterical, he counseled—for that may lead them to reject the new weapon.

	Fear must be managed, distilled and drip-fed to the people, rather like a doctor treating a man with diabetes. “The physician, therefore,” Conant wrote, “had to frighten the patient sufficiently in order to make him obey the dietary rules; but if he frightened him too much, despondency might set in—hysteria if you will—and the patient might overindulge in a mood of despair, with probably fatal consequences.”

	Conant’s arms race had limits: he drew the line at the creation of the ﬁrst hydrogen bomb, which he opposed in his capacity as a member of the General Advisory Committee on thermonuclear power. He saw in its hideous potential the capacity “to destroy far more than military objectives might ever justify”—surely a self-deceiving view after the events of 6 and 9 August.

	...In Edward Teller we encounter a fourth response: the utter rejection of any controls on nuclear arms. Teller was the apotheosis of the “warrior-scientist,” a man who gave his working life to the hydrogen bomb, and who saw in the megaton dawn over Eniwetok the harbinger of the American century.

	Teller, on whom Stanley Kubrick partly modeled the character of Dr. Strangelove, argued that America must equal or exceed the Soviet balance of terror—to assure the continuation of world peace. Negotiation, compromise, the preservation of the species, the ideal of a shared humanity: none had any traction on his argument that only by matching the Soviet arsenal could peace be assured.

	The planet was doomed, Teller believed, unless America subscribed to the logic of mutually assured destruction (MAD), in which bigger and more devastating bombs were the sole currency. Peace would only prevail in a world in which each side possessed the power to annihilate the other.


Conant and Teller also weird maybe worth looking into


...


https://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Robert_Oppenheimer
	"If the development by the enemy as well as by us of thermonuclear weapons could have been averted, I think we would be in a somewhat safer world today than we are...I do not think we want to argue technical questions here, and I do not think it is very meaningful for me to speculate as to how we would have responded had the technical picture at that time been more as it was later.
	However, it is my judgment in these things that when you see something that is technically sweet, you go ahead and do it and you argue about what to do about it only after you have had your technical success. That is the way it was with the atomic bomb. I do not think anybody opposed making it; there were some debates about what to do with it after it was made. I cannot very well imagine if we had known in late 1949 what we got to know by early 1951 that the tone of our report would have been the same."

	    Oppenheimer testifying in his defense in his 1954 security hearings, discussing the American reaction to the first successful Russian test of an atomic bomb and the debate whether to develop the "super" hydrogen bombs with vastly higher explosive power; from volume II of the Oppenheimer hearing transcripts, pg 95/266 (emphasis added)


	...But when you come right down to it the reason that we did this job is because it was an organic necessity. If you are a scientist you cannot stop such a thing. If you are a scientist you believe that it is good to find out how the world works; that it is good to find out what the realities are; that it is good to turn over to mankind at large the greatest possible power to control the world and to deal with it according to its lights and its values. 


	...It is a profound and necessary truth that the deep things in science are not found because they are useful; they are found because it was possible to find them. 


sounds familiar


...


https://www.thenewatlantis.com/publications/the-agony-of-atomic-genius
	Drawn to the recondite and inexplicable in metaphysics, Oppenheimer sought firm conviction in politics, where ideology often passes for certainty; and like so many intellectuals in the 1930s, he fell for the utopian confidence game of Communism. It took some doing to get him even to notice the political world in the first place: the depth of the Great Depression did not register with him until his students found themselves jobless. A romance with the bitterly melancholic Jean Tatlock, who had an on-again off-again affair with the Communist Party, pulled him into sinister political company. His motives were noble in part, however misguided: like many fellow travelers, he saw Soviet Communism as the only curative for Fascism. The plight of the Jews in Nazi Germany — and indeed of science itself, for quantum mechanics and relativity theory were proscribed there as “Jewish physics” — moved him to what he called “a continuing, smoldering fury” and prompted him to give three percent of his salary to displaced scientists. With his customary whirlwind energy, he supported nearly every Communist-front organization in the Bay Area, backing striking longshoremen, organizing a teachers’ union, joining several committees for the Spanish Republican cause, helping out migrant farm workers, and taking part in gatherings of parlor-pink academics and more dedicated subversives. The woman he married, Katherine Puening Harrison, was the widow of a Communist labor organizer who had died in the Spanish Civil War, and she herself had been a Party member for several years. Oppenheimer’s brother, Frank, also a physicist, and Frank’s wife were members, too.

	...At first, Oppenheimer was anything but eager to devote himself to the war effort, which he regarded as snatching the best minds away from their true vocation. However, Cassidy writes, an investigation into possible subversives that the California state assembly proposed early in 1941 made Oppenheimer fear for his teaching position, and in a letter to a friend already engaged in war research he announced that, to prove his loyalty, he too would serve his country: “I have a lot more misgivings even than you ever had about what will come of all this; but even so I think surely if I were asked to do a job I could do really well and that needed doing I’d not refuse. I’d worry a lot, perhaps even more than you. But we worry anyway.”

	...The atomic bomb would loose upon the world blast and heat and radiation of a magnitude dwarfing all previous agents of devastation. To activate this fearsome power latent in the atom required the labors of generations of scientists, most of whom never imagined their purely theoretical discoveries would be put to such use. The scientific succession reads like a Biblical genealogy, as Isaac Newton begat James Clerk Maxwell who begat Max Planck who begat Ernest Rutherford and so on to Stanislaw Ulam and Edward Teller, who begat the hydrogen bomb. Some of these researchers and thinkers were innocent as could be; in praise of Rutherford, who observed spontaneous radioactive decay in certain elements and thereby discovered the fundamental structure of the atom, his protégé James Chadwick honored “his genius to be astonished.” Wonder, sheer delighted amazement at nature’s paradoxical prodigality and order, was the prime mover for the best of these men, and probably animated all of them to some great degree. For some pure souls, working for the military corrupted that delight. As I. I. Rabi said in declining Oppenheimer’s offer to be associate director of the Manhattan Project at Los Alamos, New Mexico, he didn’t care to think that “the culmination of three centuries of physics” would be the biggest man-made explosion ever.

	Oppenheimer for his part thought less of the previous 300 years than of immediate military necessities: “To me [the task at hand] is primarily the development in time of war of a military weapon of some consequence.” The devotion to his nation’s cause was real; so was the thought that making the weapon to save civilization would win him a handsome measure of honor and renown, equal perhaps to that enjoyed by great statesmen and generals, leaving a name down the centuries more lasting than even those of Roosevelt and Churchill. Kai Bird and Martin J. Sherwin paint a vivid portrait of Oppenheimer’s ambition in American Prometheus: The Triumph and Tragedy of J. Robert Oppenheimer. In 1943, as the book reports, General Groves told a project security officer who wanted to deny Oppenheimer his security clearance that the physicist’s craving to make his world-historical name was so intense that it assured his loyalty. Already evident in youth, the longing to stand head and shoulders above the rest of humanity showed all the more obviously as the stakes, and the prizes, reached heroic proportions. The intellectual world abounds with gloryhounds, yet everyone who aspires to seriousness recognizes that the finest scholars and scientists, to a great degree, work for the sheer pleasure of knowing and not for the glint of envy in other men’s eyes. Oppenheimer was not graced with this pure-mindedness; the forces driving him were tangled and complex, or compound-complex, like an especially nasty fracture: protecting free men from the most formidable alliance of tyrants ever, winning all due recognition for his part in the success, overcoming the most refractory theoretical and practical difficulties that scientists had ever faced, commanding the greatest assembly of intellectual talent ever devoted to a single consuming public task, and proving himself in the most dramatic fashion a lord and master of nature itself. A man of such parts, had he been able to integrate the various impulses, might have been superbly whole; but Oppenheimer was anything but whole. Historians often speak of T. E. Lawrence as the most complicated soul in modern military annals; but when all the fissures, fault-lines, and contradictions are added up, Oppenheimer deserves this distinction as well.


motive complex, part for glory, part for country (or against Nazis), part for science

Groves keen on his motive for glory

	The divisions in Oppenheimer’s nature widened as the project proceeded from developing the bomb to dropping it, from the creation of a nuclear weapon to the ravaging of entire cities. While waiting for the first atomic test at Alamogordo, ever the aesthete, he sat reading Baudelaire. Addressing a meeting convened by the Secretary of War in May 1945 to decide on the use of the bombs, he enthused as over a Turner skyscape, “the visual effect of an atomic bombing would be tremendous. It would be accompanied by a brilliant luminescence which would rise to a height of 10,000 to 20,000 feet.” Only after admiring the atomic light show did Oppenheimer mention the lethal range of the explosion: any human being within two-thirds of a mile of Ground Zero was likely to die. Sometimes aesthetic appreciation can overcome moral considerations in the most disturbing way.

	Such peculiar detachment stemmed from Oppenheimer’s conviction, at least at first, that simply to produce the weapon was his exclusive concern. How the bomb was to be used remained the prerogative of statesmen and military brass. Cassidy sees this feeling of reduced moral responsibility as largely a product of the prevailing culture rather than of Oppenheimer’s distinctive sensibility: “Under Vannevar Bush [the M.I.T. engineer who sold the Manhattan Project to President Roosevelt], the scientist as the enlightened keeper of cultural ideals and an equal partner with military and political leaders was replaced by a new conception of the scientist as a mere technician of physical processes, an employee working under orders at the bottom of a bureaucratic hierarchy.” When Project physicists began to voice misgivings about the morality of their handiwork, to the point of wondering whether they could decently continue working at Los Alamos, Oppenheimer did his best to curb their doubts. Speaking to groups of the querulous and disenchanted, with gentle eloquence he admitted that atomic bombs would make fear a permanent feature of ordinary life, but then proclaimed that they might nevertheless mean an end to war. Oppenheimer had already joined Niels Bohr in foretelling that national governments would yield a significant portion of their sovereignty to the United Nations, which would guarantee the peace of the world. Oppenheimer’s assumption of moral leadership over his team convinced the scientists it was not up to them to settle political and military questions, and further assured them that the men qualified to settle such matters would come up with the right answers.


Oppenheimer bought idea that scientists are responsible for discoveries, politicians for how they're used

Cassidy blames Vannevar Bush for this culture, making scientists "bottom of buerarchial heirarchy"

Cassidy's description reminiscent of how Soviets (in the sense of "true Soviet" or psycopath) saw scientists--maybe brought that to Western world too?

idea of scientists deciding together what they should work on and being leaders seems like a nice alternative to that, a shame if what Cassidy says is true and was eroded

even if this were true though, there would still be ways to get scientists to work on weapons for you...


Oppenheimer helped convince that scientists that nukes might help end war and to leave how they're used to politicians


	The actual sight of the Trinity test explosion, however, prompted the beginnings of a change of heart, although that change was not apparent to everyone at first. I. I. Rabi remarked that after the successful test, Oppenheimer strode proudly as an Aristotelian great-souled man, who knows himself every other man’s superior, with some hip-swinging virile Hollywood flash besides: “I’ll never forget his walk; I’ll never forget the way he stepped out of the car.... [H]is walk was like High Noon ... this kind of strut. He had done it.” Yet doubts about what he had just done bored into his moral confidence, probing ever deeper over time. Years later he would remember thinking to himself as he saw the towering cloud of the blast, “Now I am become death, the destroyer of worlds” — a quotation from his beloved Bhagavad Gita, in which the god Vishnu exhorts Prince Arjuna to do his duty and pursue martial greatness. This quotation would be enshrined as Oppenheimer’s signature line, and as the expression of inconsolable regret. However, the ambiguity of the line, which speaks of awful ruin, godly power, and endless glory in the same breath, suggests the depths of Oppenheimer’s own moral confusion. He was beginning to tremble at the dark power he had helped create, but the morning of the test he could still tell the New York Times: “Lots of boys not grown up yet will owe their life to it.”


Oppenheimer cocky at first at first bomb test, doubts grew over time. "moral confusion"


	...The difficult debate over the morality of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, captured so vividly in the clash between the remorseful scientist and the hard-headed statesman, persists intensely to this day. The Japanese novelist Kenzaburo Oe, a Nobel laureate for literature, writes in his 1965 nonfiction work Hiroshima Notes, “From the instant the atomic bomb exploded, it became the symbol of all human evil; it was a savagely primitive demon and a most modern curse.” In Oe’s appraisal, Hiroshima outdoes even Auschwitz for evil. Yet his contention sounds parochial and even partisan when one considers the deliberate wickedness of Japanese wartime science, as numbered by Gavan Daws in Prisoners of the Japanese. Unit 731 in Manchuria subjected POWs and Asian civilians to so-called medical experiments after the Mengele fashion, in which the subjects were “burned with flame-throwers, blown up with shrapnel and left to develop gas gangrene, bombarded with lethal doses of X-rays, whirled to death in giant centrifuges, subjected to high pressure in sealed chambers until their eyes popped from their sockets, electrocuted, dehydrated, frozen, boiled alive.” One can debate whether using nuclear weapons is ever morally justifiable, given the unavoidability of mass civilian casualties; and one can argue whether America’s use of these weapons served a legitimate war aim.


probably didn;t..

	About Japanese wartime science, however, there is no such debate. 


there probably is

debate there would be similar kindof, "science vs. ethics" thing

sociopaths would probably see more value to science, empaths disgusted?

this say anything about author? sounds honest so far

everything he's saying true basically, "one can argue," and no public debate on Japanese experiments


	...Yet the question whether Hiroshima and Nagasaki were necessary to finish the war remains alive sixty years on. In June 1946, Oppenheimer stated that the A-bombs had been dropped on a defeated enemy. More recently, intellectuals of the Left, including provocateur Gore Vidal and Oppenheimer biographer Kai Bird, have argued that Japan was on the verge of surrender before the bombings, meaning that the 200,000 Japanese casualties were not militarily necessary. They cite Japanese diplomatic cables to President Truman stating that, although the unconditional surrender the Allies demanded was unacceptable, the only condition Japan required was that the Emperor be allowed to remain on the throne. Critics of this line of argument find the leftist outrage outrageous. As the historian Richard B. Frank recently argued in The Weekly Standard, Allied intercepts of secret Japanese diplomatic cables revealed that the compromise peace was a red herring, that Japan intended to resist to the cruel finish, and that the Japanese believed the flabby Allies, weak even in victory, could be convinced thereby to set more agreeable terms for surrender. Furthermore, the Japanese military insisted not merely that the Emperor remain as figurehead but that the native military ethos and apparatus be preserved: the intention was to make peace only to prepare for later war. Hiroshima, then, spared an estimated million lives, which would have been lost in a full-out invasion of the home islands. The matter of Nagasaki is more problematic, however. Oppenheimer would state in 1953 that he “didn’t understand to this day why Nagasaki was necessary.” Some of those who now believe it to have been necessary argue that the Japanese military had its fanatics who were unconvinced even by Hiroshima that it was time to give up; others suspect that the Nagasaki bombing may have been conducted principally to get the Soviets’ attention, a first strike in the long Cold War to come.


shows bias here

probably impossible to guess without doing same treatment like to Russian revolution, Black September, etc.


	...But Oppenheimer was never of one mind for long. The Soviets’ test of an atomic bomb in 1949 propelled him back to the internationalist position he had taken just after the war, believing that a single world organization should govern the nuclear policies of every individual nation. While Edward Teller insisted that the Super was needed now more than ever, Oppenheimer huffed, “Keep your shirt on.” He joined Enrico Fermi and other eminent physicists in lobbying Roosevelt’s former vice-president Henry Wallace to stop H-bomb development, “primarily because we should prefer defeat in war to victory obtained at the expense of the enormous human disaster that would be caused by its determined use.” To possess a weapon of incalculable potency — some theoreticians feared it could ignite the atmosphere in an explosive chain reaction and destroy the earth — would pose graver dangers than not to have one at all.

	AEC commissioner Lewis Strauss did not agree, joining Teller as the loudest voice in favor of a “quantum jump” in the lethal capacity of our nuclear stockpile. They wanted H-bombs as fast as they could be built. For a time, Oppenheimer’s counsel prevailed in the AEC; in November 1949 the Commission narrowly voted not to go after the Super. In short order, however, President Truman overrode the Commission’s decision, and the Super project was underway.

	On February 1, 1950, the day after Truman had inaugurated development of the Super, J. Edgar Hoover informed Strauss that a Soviet spy had infiltrated the Manhattan Project during the war: Klaus Fuchs, a German refugee from Nazism. Strauss blamed Oppenheimer for this terrible lapse in security, and went after him with everything he had. Oppenheimer made other powerful enemies as well, notably the anti-Communist Congressman Henry “Scoop” Jackson and the Strategic Air Command. While Oppenheimer was making the case for tactical nuclear weapons, useful on the battlefield, the Strategic Air Command’s war plan emphasized a massive and decisive nuclear first strike in the event of a conventional Soviet attack on Western Europe. According to Bird and Sherwin, the H-bomb advocates were so obsessed with the threat of Communism that they believed “Oppenheimer’s championing of tactical nuclear weapons was a ploy to block the Super Bomb.” Teller went so far as to spread the word that in trying to block the H-bomb Oppenheimer was acting on “direct orders from Moscow.” Teller may have been out of control, the Strategic Air Command may have been defending its turf, and Strauss may have been seeking personal revenge against Oppenheimer, but all the same, the gravest matters were at stake. The Soviet Union was a real threat that needed to be confronted with sobriety; seeing the defenders of the H-bomb as fanatics and conspiracy theorists foolishly belittles the existential challenge America was then just beginning to face.


Oppenheimer didn't want to develop H-Bomb since only winning move in that game not to play

after that he got blamed for lapse in security in A-bomb project, got accused of being Soviet agent for not wanting H-bomb


	...These ideological battles eventually, and perhaps inevitably, became even more personal. By 1953, Oppenheimer had discovered that the Strategic Air Command’s battle plan called for the defense of its own attack force but did nothing to protect the nation itself from attack: that job would have distracted from the self-appointed task of retaliating in turn for the Soviet retaliation for an American first strike. This military secret, Oppenheimer believed, had to be made public, yet such publicity was anathema to Strauss and his band. President Eisenhower seemed receptive at first to the Oppenheimer line, but Strauss saw to it that the President wound up mistrusting the physicist. In due course, Eisenhower authorized an AEC investigation into Oppenheimer’s loyalty, and ordered the attorney general to erect “a blank wall” to keep Oppenheimer away from classified material. In November 1953, Oppenheimer was presented with a formal list of the charges against him and informed that his security clearance was suspended. 



Oppenheimer wanted SAC to make public MAD ideas (isn't that necessary for them to work) but Eisnerhower didn't want to and became estranged to Oppenheimer. Strauss helped with that

it was after this that charges came out against Oppenheimer in hearing


	...The hearing board voted 2-1 not to reinstate Oppenheimer’s security clearance. Of the two men voting against Oppenheimer, Bird and Sherwin write, “what they were saying was that they opposed Oppenheimer’s judgments and they did not want his views represented in the counsels of government. Oppenheimer wanted to corral and perhaps even reverse the nuclear arms race. He wanted to encourage an open democratic debate on whether the United States should adopt genocide as its primary defense strategy. Apparently, Gray and Morgan considered these sentiments unacceptable in 1954. More, they were asserting in effect that it was not legitimate, not permissible, for a scientist to express strong disagreement on matters of military policy.” This assessment of motives is partially foolish and partially sound. Genocide was never the primary defense strategy of the United States: had the government wished to conduct a genocidal war against the Soviet Union, it could have done so, when it had the A-bomb for years while the Soviets did not, and when it had the H-bomb for a year and a half while the Soviets did not.


Bird and Sherwin maybe go too far in supporting Oppenheimer, maybe "politicizing" it


	...As for Oppenheimer, he withdrew from public life to head the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton, attracting world-class physicists and other intellectual leading lights to a sort of academic utopia, where they were free to pursue their work just as they chose. Bird and Sherwin see this return of Oppenheimer’s to the academic cloister as a thrashing for the forces of enlightenment, which should have been deciding on the most urgent matters of public policy rather than relegated to the academic sidelines or reduced to mere technicians in the service of political men. “For a few years after World War II, scientists had been regarded as a new class of intellectuals, members of a public-policy priesthood who might legitimately offer expertise not only as scientists but as public philosophers. With Oppenheimer’s defrocking, scientists knew that in the future they could serve the state only as experts on narrow scientific issues.”


wonder if they're happy about this?

not that scientists should rule the world, but that they're relegated to just another tool for manipulative people to exploit


	...The record of Oppenheimer’s own divided mind shows that technical expertise is something very different from prudence. That he was a superb technician, even that he was a man of acute sensibility, did not make him a public philosopher or statesman. He felt everything — pride in his competence and leadership during the Second World War, pride in his noble intransigence during the Cold War, intellectual pleasure in what he called the “technically sweet” conception of the H-bomb, self-disgust that he could feel such pleasure in so monstrous a creation — but could decide on nothing. Brilliance of this scattershot type effectively disqualifies a man from political decision-making. Oppenheimer was simply not the sort of man a nation can entrust with its fate.


maybe Oppenheimer would be seen as a good target for that


	...In The Ruin of J. Robert Oppenheimer, Harvard scholar Priscilla J. McMillan examines that sad wreckage of his public career like a child observing insects through a magnifying glass: detail unseen by the naked eye looms big as life but grossly distorted, so the overall impression is of a horror show: malign right-wing spiders draining the life out of an unfortunate fly that meant no one any harm. A general presumption of fatuousness and viciousness on the part of Oppenheimer’s opponents dominates McMillan’s thinking: they are villains plain and simple, bereft of serious ideas — for surely no sensible person can regard 1950s anti-Communism as intellectually serious — and driven by petty grievances and savage compulsions they were either unaware of or simply unwilling to acknowledge. Admittedly, sometimes McMillan’s attribution of low motives seems plausible or even convincing — one can well believe that Strauss’s social envy of Oppenheimer, or his resentment for a cutting remark at his expense, played some part in his antagonism, or that Teller’s vanity made him want to crush his detractors. But even then one cannot but notice that the essence of the story, the clash of fundamental ideas about political good and evil, about democracy and Communist tyranny, is missing entirely. From the first page of this book, where McMillan writes of the “disagreement” between the U.S. and U.S.S.R. as “harden[ing] into a state of permanent tension,” there sounds the familiar squealing note of childish liberal make-believe, the naïve faith that disagreements can of course be smoothed out by reasonable and well-meaning people, so that this hardening into antipathy can only be a failure to act on our better angels. McMillan prefers to believe that if only the United States had been more considerate of Soviet feelings, the unpleasantness of the nuclear arms race could have been avoided. 


author suspicious of how McMillan assigns motives in his book?

reasonable guess that some of the motives were to carry out plan for active measures... McMillan's book might give a hint at what plots were there


article gets weirder toward end


...


http://www.nuclearfiles.org/menu/library/correspondence/oppenheimer-robert/corr_oppenheimer_1954-03-04.htm
	In preparing this letter, I have reviewed two decades of my life. I have recalled instances where I acted unwisely. What I have hoped was, not that I could wholly avoid error, but that I might learn from it. What I have learned has, I think, made me more fit to serve my country.

	Very truly yours,

	J. Robert Oppenheimer

	Princeton, N.J., March 4, 1954 


I'll take it!


https://www.mercurynews.com/2013/10/14/j-robert-oppenheimers-private-passions-explored/


a book on Tatlock, Kitty Oppie and yet another woman he was apparently seeing...


	...“An Atomic Love Story” portrays him in human terms. “These women helped create him as a human being of feeling and character,” Klaus says. “Robert is often described as brilliant and arrogant, without friends. But in these relationships — especially with Jean and Ruth — there was a depth of affection that helped make him the person he was. They humanized him, in a way that power politics never did.”


maybe bad news for Oppenheimer

if he doesn't have many friends and these are only people who "get" him or something, they will have a lot of influence on him. And since he's cheating on his wife, neither might grow much sympathy for him if they were spies...

similar with LBJ and Lady Bird. Was an asshole to her, might have hit her and cheated, so easier for her to spy on him or use him basically. After his stroke LBJ said to rely on her a lot more.



http://www.theatlantic.com/sponsored/wgn-manhattan-project/the-women-of-los-alamos/580/
	“I wasn’t supposed to say where we were going or anything,” Oppenheimer said, according to transcripts. “I felt that she had to see me. She was undergoing psychiatric treatment. She was extremely unhappy.”

	The next morning, she took him to the airport, and he never saw her again. Half a year later, in January 1944, she was found dead in her apartment.

	At the 1954 hearings that would eventually deprive Oppenheimer of his security clearance, federal prosecutor Roger Robb asked Oppenheimer why Tatlock had wanted to see him.

	“Because she was still in love with me,” he said.


did she really "need him" or a ploy?

interesting if cover--"undergoing psychatric treatment" would be reason to point to suicide


	...During the war or shortly after, Oppenheimer may have had other romantic entanglements. According to Atomic Love Story: The Extraordinary Women in Robert Oppenheimer’s Life, he adored psychologist Ruth Sherman Tolman, the wife of his close friend chemist Richard Tolman, a scientific adviser to the Manhattan Project.


one person with access to two nuclear scientists. Anything going on there?


	...Despite all, Oppenheimer and his wife remained together for the rest of their lives. In The Making of the Atomic Bomb, author Richard Rhodes describes Kitty Oppenheimer as a passionate woman who presented herself as someone who needed saving. “Robert jumped in like the white knight that he…wanted to be.”


maybe could play to his ego

both psychiatrists

how would this work exactly?

try to get a "model" of a person, get so you can predict how they will act

if want him to make selfish decision, play up his ego beforehand without even talking about decision (which would be hard if classified). So any influence is good

even just introducing him to people a big deal, something Oppenheimer said Tatlock did introducing him to Communists


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jean_Tatlock
	She began seeing Robert Oppenheimer in 1936, when she was a graduate student there and Oppenheimer was a professor of physics at Berkeley.[17] They met through his landlady, Mary Ellen Washburn, who was also a member of the Communist party


lolwut


	...Her father found her correspondence and sifted through it, burning letters and photographs in the fireplace. At 5:10 pm he called the Halstead Funeral Home, who contacted the police. The police arrived at 5:30 pm, accompanied by the deputy coroner. 

	...One doctor observed that: "If you were clever and wanted to kill someone, this is the way to do it."[48]

	Her father had her remains cremated.[49]


what's up with wiki article making it sound like her father did it?


I guess a better question is why did he see fit to burn everything


https://www.manhattanprojectvoices.org/tags/ruth-tolman
	Jean Bacher: Ruth Valentine said, “I shall take Ruth [Tolman]’s desk.” She always saved letters. She had marvelous long letters from Robert, you know, especially at the time of the hearings. I knew they were just terribly close and shared a great deal. On the drawer of the desk, she’d said, “Destroy these.”

	Martin Sherwin: You saw it happen? 

	Bacher: I didn’t see her burn it, because at that time we still burned and they just threw them out in the burner in the back yard.


I see a pattern here...

no wonder I can't find anything!


	...Bacher: Oh, there were lots of really fascinating evenings. There would always be groups doing one thing or another. There was a poker group and square dancing group and music groups of all kinds. It was the most organized place you had ever seen.

	Sherwin: Was Oppenheimer part of those kinds of things?

	Bacher: Not so much. He and Kitty really didn’t share that much. I mean they had close friends, especially the Weisskopfs. They lived quite close, and also the Serbers. You have talked to Bob Serber?

	Sherwin: Yes, I have.

	Bacher: And the Wilsons, Bob and Jane Wilson? 

	Sherwin: I have talked to them on the phone but not in person.

	Bacher: Yeah, and Ed McMillan and Elsie. They lived just next door. But I think you know Robert was more withdrawn. He didn’t really get friendly with many other people. They would when visitors would come, and you would get invited to have cocktails with the General or with some of the special people who came. For instance, Niels Bohr. Everybody thought he was absolutely wonderful. Do you know his son, Aage Bohr?

	Sherwin: I know who he is.

	Bacher: So you know the richness of the society was really—

	Sherwin: It was extraordinary.

	Bacher: Extraordinary.

	Sherwin: The history of physics, really.


oppenheimer also close to Weisskopfs, Serbers, Neils Bohr


	...Sherwin: What was your impression of his—

	Bacher: You mean of Kitty?

	Sherwin: Well, his directorship, and also of Kitty and their relationship and just the whole interaction?

	Bacher: Well, you know, Kitty was really quite an autocratic kind of a person. She was also devoted to Robert, and really was determined to see that he didn’t get more than he could handle. It’s very hard to say very much about it because Kitty was very hard on her relations with other women. She got along reasonably well with Ellen Weisskopf. You should talk to Ellen really if you want to get a more sympathetic view of Kitty, because I think they were pretty good friends. But she was also very difficult to handle.

	For instance, she and Charlotte Serber and the Wilsons all had horses that they would go up and ride to get some relaxation on the weekend. I remember Kitty’s horse – she was devoted to her horse – and Charlotte’s got into some sort of a fight, and Kitty’s was injured pretty severely. That, you know, really broke up the whole friendship between Kitty and Charlotte. I think it did not touch the relationships that Bob Serber had with Robert, but well, it was all part of being under tremendous tension and not being able to accommodate yourself to some of the things that happened. Kitty was a very attractive person.

	Sherwin: Did you see the BBC series?

	Bacher: Yes.

	Sherwin: What was your judgment about the way they treated her?

	Bacher: Well, some of it I think was justified. What did Frank tell you? I think Frank resented it.

	Sherwin: Frank was very angry.

	Bacher: Yeah.

	Sherwin: People I have talked to who knew them, the spectrum of their views went from one, that it was too kind to her, to Frank’s view, which is the most critical and said that it was very unfair. Where would you say it was accurate, and where could it have been more so?

	Bacher: I think it is something I would rather not say, because personally I just didn’t like Kitty myself. After a while I wasn’t computing because my brother came with his children and my sister-in-law was quite ill. So I stopped working for a while to try to handle some things there. 

	I think what happened at that time was sort of an example, perhaps, because Kitty said, “Well, I will bring Pete [Peter Oppenheimer] over and you can take care of him while I go off skiing.” It was just that sort of thing that would get people angry at her.

	I said, “Well, I will take Pete just once.” I did. I just took him once. It is just an example of the kind of her taking advantage of people when she really shouldn’t have, and asking for things that people would feel that they couldn’t refuse. That is just an example of what most people’s reactions stem from.


Kitty autocratic and uses people, devoted to Oppenheimer, close to Ellen Weisskopf.

Bacher says she didn't like Kitty and a BBC series including her was too kind to her

a little weird that someone like that would be devoted to Oppenheimer despite his infidelity


https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/why-were-so-many-womens-history-month_b_4974642.html


summarrizes part of "Atomic Love Story" book

Jean Tatlock not into dudes?

don't really know but I guess could make it easier to manipulate him if true, wouldn't be able to fall in love

------

http://blog.nuclearsecrecy.com/2015/12/11/the-curious-death-of-oppenheimers-mistress/


------


https://imgur.com/a/Zg11Y



------


"Atomic Love Story book"

Kindle Location 2964

	His thoughts quickly turned to what he now saw as thje overwhelming problem: What could be done to control such an apocalyptic weapon? The problem, he repeated, was "what is going to happen afterwards."

	In Washington, Bohr bustled about seeing influential people, explaining that he felt the only way to avoid a postwar arms race was to share the information with the Russians from the start. General Groves was apoplectic, and became even more intent on getting this "extremely superior person" safely behind the fences at Los Alamos, and keeping him there as long as possible. 


location 3015

	...Robert would recall that Boh was marvelous and that, although he took a lively technical interest, "His real function, I think, for almost all of us, was not a technical one. He made the whole enterprise seem hopeful, when many were not free of misgiving." That night, a reception was held in the great room at Fuller Lodge. The first question Bohr put to Oppenheimer was: "Is it big enough?" Would the power of the bomb be destructive enough to put an end to all war?



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Niels_Bohr
	Bohr read the 19th-century Danish Christian existentialist philosopher, Søren Kierkegaard. Richard Rhodes argued in The Making of the Atomic Bomb that Bohr was influenced by Kierkegaard through Høffding.[74] In 1909, Bohr sent his brother Kierkegaard's Stages on Life's Way as a birthday gift. In the enclosed letter, Bohr wrote, "It is the only thing I have to send home; but I do not believe that it would be very easy to find anything better ... I even think it is one of the most delightful things I have ever read." Bohr enjoyed Kierkegaard's language and literary style, but mentioned that he had some disagreement with Kierkegaard's philosophy.[75] Some of Bohr's biographers suggested that this disagreement stemmed from Kierkegaard's advocacy of Christianity, while Bohr was an atheist.[76][77][78]

	There has been some dispute over the extent to which Kierkegaard influenced Bohr's philosophy and science. David Favrholdt argued that Kierkegaard had minimal influence over Bohr's work, taking Bohr's statement about disagreeing with Kierkegaard at face value,[79] while Jan Faye argued that one can disagree with the content of a theory while accepting its general premises and structure.


Kierkegaard seems potentially a little weird I guess "exisitentialist" and wrote some thing on ethics that sounds similar to dialouges in Hell

	...The rise of Nazism in Germany prompted many scholars to flee their countries, either because they were Jewish or because they were political opponents of the Nazi regime. In 1933, the Rockefeller Foundation created a fund to help support refugee academics, and Bohr discussed this programme with the President of the Rockefeller Foundation, Max Mason, in May 1933 during a visit to the United States. Bohr offered the refugees temporary jobs at the Institute, provided them with financial support, arranged for them to be awarded fellowships from the Rockefeller Foundation, and ultimately found them places at institutions around the world. Those that he helped included Guido Beck, Felix Bloch, James Franck, George de Hevesy, Otto Frisch, Hilde Levi, Lise Meitner, George Placzek, Eugene Rabinowitch, Stefan Rozental, Erich Ernst Schneider, Edward Teller, Arthur von Hippel and Victor Weisskopf.[81]


helped some of the influences on Oppenhiemer and got them jobs

I mean nothing wrong with this unless they were selective with scientists they rescued...


	...Bohr did not remain at Los Alamos, but paid a series of extended visits over the course of the next two years. Robert Oppenheimer credited Bohr with acting "as a scientific father figure to the younger men", most notably Richard Feynman.[110]



Bohr influential on Oppenheimer and Richard "It was definitely the O-Rings" Feyneman


	...Bohr recognised early that nuclear weapons would change international relations. In April 1944, he received a letter from Peter Kapitza, written some months before when Bohr was in Sweden, inviting him to come to the Soviet Union. The letter convinced Bohr that the Soviets were aware of the Anglo-American project, and would strive to catch up. He sent Kapitza a non-committal response, which he showed to the authorities in Britain before posting.[112] Bohr met Churchill on 16 May 1944, but found that "we did not speak the same language".[113] Churchill disagreed with the idea of openness towards the Russians to the point that he wrote in a letter: "It seems to me Bohr ought to be confined or at any rate made to see that he is very near the edge of mortal crimes."[114]

	Oppenheimer suggested that Bohr visit President Franklin D. Roosevelt to convince him that the Manhattan Project should be shared with the Soviets in the hope of speeding up its results. Bohr's friend, Supreme Court Justice Felix Frankfurter, informed President Roosevelt about Bohr's opinions, and a meeting between them took place on 26 August 1944. Roosevelt suggested that Bohr return to the United Kingdom to try to win British approval.[115][116] When Churchill and Roosevelt met at Hyde Park on 19 September 1944, they rejected the idea of informing the world about the project, and the aide-mémoire of their conversation contained a rider that "enquiries should be made regarding the activities of Professor Bohr and steps taken to ensure that he is responsible for no leakage of information, particularly to the Russians".[117]


Oppenheimer and Bohr wanted to share the Manhatten project with the Russians...


Bohr and Oppenheimer similar? both wierd and philosophical, both pissed at Nazis and I guess falling for "enemy of my enemy is my friend" thinking



...


Location 3069


on Jean Tatlock's death and Oppenheimer's reaction


if assassinated, why?

knew too much? not actually sociopath and had feelings for him? just wanted to fuck with Oppenheimer's head more?


author of book seems to go for arguing she committed suicide so far, saying she had psychiatric trouble, or was distraught over being lesbian


Location 3101

goes over story of Jean's death

something odd about her father--why did he come over right away and crawl in through a window to burn her stuff?

why not call cops or ambulence right away?


Location 3112


	...He sorted out some of the letters and photographs and put them in the fireplace. What did he not want other eyes to see? Possibly Jean had kept the letters that May Sarton had written when they were young and struggling with sexual identity. Or there many have been letters from Robert that should not be exposed. Tatlock was sympathetic to his daughter's political views. (He and Robert and Haakon Chevalier had purchased an ambulance to send to Spain during the Civil War.) But he was also aware of how, in the current political atmosphere, his daughter's Communist ties might cause damage to others. Other letters might have revealed a continuing sexual ambiguity. He attempted to protect her memory, which was all that was left.


hmmm


	...He watched as the attendants wrapped her body and carried her away to the city morgue. He was told to follow, to make an official identification, and that he needed another person as well. He called Siegfriend Bernfeld. Among the things Tatlock had found in Jean's papers was a bill for $760 from Bernfeld. It was the amount she owed for psycotherapy she was undergoing as part of her training. The newspapers would report the item, inferring that she had sought psychiatric help.


I think the authors know what happened...


Location 3132


	...Hugh did not know about Boris Pash, or that Jean's phone had been tapped, or that J. Edgar's agents had been tracking his sister.


Maybe going for aruging she was assassinated after all?


Location 3205: authors say Kitty O. had "Nazi Connections" (??)

quote on her by Emily Morrison:

	"Kitty was a very strange woman. She would pick a pet, one of the wives, and be extraordinarily friendly with her, and then drop her for no reason. She had temporary favorites. That's the way she was. She did it to one person after another . . . She could be a very bewitching person but she was someone to be wary of."


sounds like sociopath with trouble managing it?


book negative on Kitty, talks about her drinking a lot, being selfish, people not liking her

was previously married to communist and says drew suspicion for being Oppenheimer's 
"most obvious link to communism" https://www.atomicheritage.org/profile/katherine-kitty-oppenheimer


interesting, book location 3228:


	...[Groves] decided it was time to loosen security and allow the civilians a few days off, even a week. He made an exception for Kitty and granted her request to go home to Pittsburgh for an indefinite period, even if her mother was the cousin of one of Hitler's top generals.


Kitty had family Nazi ties, and author points to Groves being lax on Nazi infiltration for this (seems like he was more lax on soviet infiltration...)


Location 3238: says Chevaliers took care of Oppenheimer's kid for awhile

or other way around? not sure what book saying

sounds like they were pretty close

wanted Pat Sherr to adopt his kid? told "I can't love her?" something going on with Oppenheimer..

author says he was stressed with the commie investigation

says Kitty started denying "Communism and her past" I guess as investigation was heating up (Location 3249)


interesting way author writes about Kitty's parents Lcation 3273:

	...In America's Revolutionary War, General George Washington had crossed the Deleware at Rigelsville to attack the British. George Washington didn't seem particularly historic to Kaethe Peuning, who liked to repeat the family lore that one of her noble ancestors had fought in the Crusades in 1150.

	...Kaethe, sixty-three that spring, was the eldest of six in the Vissering clan. Two of her sistershad sons fighting in the war, and her brother's son was a Panzer commander. Another sister, Hidegard, was an assistant film director, most notoriously on the film J'Accuse, a Geobbels sponsored film supporitn gthe Nazi euthenasia program in 1941. Kathe had other cousins who were officers in the Wehrmacth. ...Kaethe and Franz would have heard radio reports of the failed assassintation attempt on Hitler; from the front page headline of the New York Times the next day, they learned that Wilhelm Keitel, far from supporting the assassination attempt, "issued all the necessary instructions to all the fighting services and . . . military commanders" that Hitler was alive and in command, and that the suspects were to be arrested.

	Kaethe no longer mentioned that she had once been engaged to Keitel.

	On May 8, 1945, after Hitler had committed suicide, FIeld Marshal Keitel was left to sign the official surrender to the Russians in Berlin. That day was declared VE Day: Victory in Europe.


Location 3307:

	...the Lsos team found what they had been looking for--the documents revealing that the Nazis did not have an atomic weapon. There had never been a race.


nuke race with Nazis made up? worth looking into


book mentions Anne Wilson that Oppenheimer chose as secretary, says she listened on him and Groves conversations--anything there? Location 3329

started rumors of another Oppenheiemr affair and Kitty confronted her. Then they became friends for "many years"

"Anne never found out who had sent the roses."

KGB roses?

one theory: authors know some secrets, are a bit evil and can't help dropping hints (shouldn't get too carried away with this idea tho)


Location 3464

talks about Oppenheimer's moral confusion over bomb, says "When Robert seemed dangerously close to a breaking point, physicists Bob Bacher and I. I. Rabi calmed him."

continues:

	On August 7, Haakon Chevalier wrote from the San Francisco area, "Dear Opje, You are probably the most famous man in the world today . . . we are very proud of you." He continued in a more solemn tone: "There is a weight in such a venture which few men in history have had to bear. I know that with your love of men, it is no light thing to have had a part, and a great part, in a diabolical contrivance for destroying them. But in the possibilities of death are also the possibilities of life, and these I know have been uppermost in your mind . . . You have made history. We are happy for you."



what's up with his letter?


https://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:3h7Bf0Lzzy4J:https://jeffersonal.issuu.com/luisalopes5/docs/writing_-_directing_and_producing_documentary_film/125+&cd=5&hl=en&ct=clnk&gl=us&client=firefox-b-1-ab
	Audio Narrator: In August 1945, the city of Hiroshima was destroyed in about nine seconds by a single atom bomb. The man responsible for building the bomb was a gentle and eloquent physicist named J. Robert Oppenheimer. This is the story of Robert Oppenheimer and the atomic bomb. Hakon Chevalier: Stinson beach, California, August 7, 1945. Dear Oppie: You are probably the most famous man in the world today, and yet I am not sure this letter will reach you. If it does, I want you to know we are very proud of you. And if it doesn’t, you will know



https://web.archive.org/save/http://www.isitdownrightnow.com/jeffersonal.issuu.com.html

but it's down and can't get next page 


full letter:


http://www.2020hindsight.org/2005/08/07/1945-dear-opje/
	Dear Opje,

	You are probably the most famous man in the world today and yet I am not sure that this letter will reach you. But if it does, I want you to know that we are very proud of you. And if it doesn’t you will know it anyway.

	We have been irritated by your reticence these past few years, but under the itchy surface we knew that it was all right, that the work was progressing, that the heart was still there, and the warm being we have known and cherished.

	I can understand now as I could guess then the somber note in you during our last meetings. There is a weight in such a venture which few men in history have had to bear. I know that with your love of men, it is no light thing to have had a part—and a great part— in a diabolical contrivance for destroying them. But in the possibilities of death are also the possibilituies of life. You have made history. We are happy for you.


maybe playing to ego?

like did they want him to try to argue bomb was good thing, tie it to his fame, all that?

sounds more like it would make him feel guilty, like remind him of "diabolical contrivance for destroying" life

what does "we knew that the work was progressing" mean?

"the war being we have known and cherished" still there--like are they saying he's turning into a bad person but "we know deep down inside you're good"

"understand the somber note in you during our last meetings" sounds like he's a psychologist or something


https://www.manhattanprojectvoices.org/oral-histories/haakon-chevaliers-interview-part-1

interview with Chevalier


https://archive.nytimes.com/www.nytimes.com/learning/teachers/featured_articles/20020909monday.html
	The book says the two men met in 1937 and became close friends, founding a campus branch of a teacher's union and sponsoring benefits for leftist causes.

	They also joined a secret unit of the American Communist Party made up primarily of Berkeley professors, Chevalier said in letters from the 1960's that Dr. Herken has uncovered. Chevalier wrote from France, where he went in 1950 after being accused of anti-American activities.

	In one letter, dated July 1964, Chevalier informs Oppenheimer that he is planning to write a memoir referring to the Communist Party cell. He praised the unit's publications as still making "impressive reading" and to credit Oppenheimer with their authorship.

	He concluded by promising to "do my best" to respect Oppenheimer's wishes if he objected to the goal.

	"Indeed I do," the physicist replied in a curt letter from Princeton, where he was director of the Institute for Advanced Study. "What you say of me is not true. I have never been a member of the Communist Party, and thus have never been a member of a Communist Party unit."

	Weeks later, Chevalier wrote to another member of the cell that he "had originally planned to reveal" that Oppenheimer was a Communist, but added, "I decided that I shouldn't, even though the fact is of considerable historical importance."

	Apparently unaware of Chevalier's decision, Oppenheimer in March 1965 discussed with his lawyer the possibility of enjoining publication of the memoir, according to a record of the discussion Dr. Herken found in Oppenheimer's papers.

	Chevalier's memoir, "Oppenheimer: The Story of a Friendship," published in 1965, referred to the unit briefly and elliptically as a political "discussion group" but said nothing about its Communist Party ties.


Oppenheimer and Chevalier not so chummy in later years


	... Since completing the book, Dr. Herken has continued to track down corroborating evidence.

	He said a widow of one of the unit's members confirmed in an unpublished memoir that Oppenheimer belonged to the secret group.

	Dr. Herken said he had also found an elderly person who had helped organize the secret units of the Communist Party in California.

	Dr. Herken concluded from his research that Oppenheimer was a loyal American. But it is clear, he added, that the physicist never would have won the atom job if his Communist Party membership had been disclosed publicly.

	"That," Dr. Herken said, "would have been a showstopper."


Dr. Herken says Oppenheimer was in a secret Communist cell in late 30's and early 40's


https://www.sfgate.com/politics/article/THE-OPPENHEIMER-RIDDLE-New-evidence-of-2788653.php
	Herken's findings will face public scrutiny today when a critical mass of Oppenheimer scholars convenes at UC Berkeley. The campus is celebrating the centennial of Oppenheimer's birth with special exhibits and a two-day conference today and Saturday.

	"The evidence is pretty compelling," Herken said of two unpublished memoirs that recently came to light -- one by a Berkeley professor and one by the wife of a close associate of Oppenheimer's.

	The two documents offer details about a small group of professionals that met regularly, sometimes at Oppenheimer's home, in the far-left milieu of 1930s Berkeley. One manuscript calls it "a secret unit of the Communist Party" with six to eight members. The other says that the three UC faculty members of the group, including Oppenheimer, all saw themselves as Communist and produced a Communist newsletter.

	"Oppenheimer had always denied membership in the Communist Party," said Herken, who was a senior historian at the Smithsonian Institution before joining the new Merced faculty. "Now, it's pretty clear he wasn't telling the truth." 

	..."We disagree with Herken," said Tufts University history Professor Martin Sherwin, co-author with historian Kai Bird of an upcoming Oppenheimer biography.

	It's true that Oppenheimer, who died in 1967, belonged to a loose-knit group of like-minded professionals who shared some Communist views and had links to Communist Party members, but not all members of such groups were party members, Sherwin said. 


1st article 2002 this 2004

seems basically right, was meeting with a bunch of Communists and cared about their cause, whether or not was a card carrying member


	...In the other manuscript, the late Barbara Chevalier, wife of Oppenheimer friend Haakon Chevalier, wrote of the group, saying her husband and Oppenheimer "joined a secret unit of the Communist Party. There must have been only six or eight members."

	The new evidence buttresses Haakon Chevalier's description of the group included in Herken's 2002 book, "Brotherhood of the Bomb," about Oppenheimer and fellow A-bomb scientists Ernest Lawrence and Edward Teller.

	"Oppenheimer would later characterize the group as an innocent and rather naive political coffee klatch," Herken wrote in his book, which cites Haakon Chevalier's characterization of the assemblage as "a 'closed unit' of the Communist Party." 


more to this? got impression Chevalier was of the mind of blackmailing Oppenheimer with Communist connections


https://books.google.com/books?id=BTUwAAAAQBAJ&pg=PT463&lpg=PT463

in 1964 Chevalier wrote letter to Oppenheimer saying "we were in the same unit of the CP from 1938 to 1942"


maybe Chevalier is to Oppenheimer as Roger Stone is to Donald Trump?

"Atomic Love Story" book says Oppenheimer not always happy with getting letters from Chevalier

Chevalier would know Oppenehimer wanted to bury his Communist connections, especially after the hearing. So why keep brining it up?

Oppenheimer's reaction to Chevalier asking about whether or not to put his commie connections in memoir (try to enjoin publishing of book) would only make it look even worse, that Oppenheimer was desperately tying to hide his sordid Communist espionage ties

it's a little like Donald Trump's Russia ties...



http://www.brotherhoodofthebomb.com/bhbsource/documents.html


book cover a bunch of dudes in trenchcoats and fedoras smoking pipes

a blinking text "New Evidence" followed by:

	...New Evidence Document #4: Author's Note: Is belonging to a "closed unit" in the CP tantamount to Communist Party membership?


problem with this: communist sympathies, being a card carying member or not doesn't really matter. Whats really important is: where they a "true believer" or a con-artist type? that makes a huge difference for understanding what they were up to. consider difference between Burtsev and Azef, both "communists" (or "socialists",) one working for the people and one working for the Okhrana...

maybe the author of the book knows this?

what does this say about Herken's evidence? could be legit and this is a way to politicize it, by presenting it this way. dunno if memiors by Chevaliers can be taken at face value in any event


http://www.brotherhoodofthebomb.com/bhbsource/document1.html

http://www.brotherhoodofthebomb.com/bhbsource/document2.html

Chevalier kindof a dick


http://www.brotherhoodofthebomb.com/bhbsource/new_evidence_2.html


Barbara Chevalier makes it sound like Haakon was trying to recruit Oppenheimer for Russian gov

	"...I was not of course in the kitchen when Haakon spoke to Oppie, but I knew that he was going to tell him. I also know that Haakon was one hundred percent in favor of finding out what Oppie was doing and reporting it back to Eltenton. I believe Haakon also believed that Oppie would be in a favor of coopoerating with the Russians I know because we had a big fight over it beforehand."


	...Oppie had meanwhile changed his position on the Russians: "Haakon, he said, Haakon, believe me, I am serious, I have real reason to believe, and I cannot tell you why, but I assure you I have real reason to change my mind about Russia. They are not what you believe them to be. You must not continue your trust, your blind faith in the policies of the USSR." But Barbara also wrote that Haakon was not persuaded.


like Oppenheimer was trying to recruit Haakon too in a way


https://books.google.com/books/about/Oppenheimer.html?id=H05DAAAAIAAJ
	Oppenheimer: the story of a friendship

	by Haakon Chevalier


lol



http://www.brotherhoodofthebomb.com/bhbsource/document7.html


docs showed Soviet intel intent to cultivate oppenheimer



------


"Atomic Love Story"

location 3508

says politician Bernard Baruch and Soviets made Oppenheimer's idea for intenational control of nuclear weapons not work. Baruch modified the proposal to tip toward "American interests" and Soviets rejected. 


location 3520

	...she was enjoying Robert's access to the power brokers in Washington. Kitty knew by then taht the FBI was taping their conversations. She would have been pleased when they copied Robert telling someone he couldn't give them an answer until he communicated "with my boss." That Boss being Kitty.



-----


https://books.google.com/books?id=jfSn2RJZI9EC&pg=PA364&lpg=PA364

Ruth Tollman and Oppenhemer wrote love letters to each other, many of the letters were destroyed


"Atomic Love Story" location 3724

	In the two years after the war, Robert's connection with Ruth had become more profound. ...Ruth radiated warmth; she would tilt her head when speaking to someone, inclingng slightly toward them as if to indicate: tell me more. She had a curious mind; she made few demands; she lsitened and, at the right moment, offered thoughtful advice or asked the right question.

	Robert and Ruth would speak often on the telephone--but rarely from home or office lines, monitored by the FBI. They consistently worked to find little islands of time together. At the end of August in 1947, Ruth ended a chatty letter, "I am going East . . . but only to Detroit. If you should be there (I confess I can't quite imagine why) I am going to APA meetings. My adress will be Hotel Statler. Come to us when you can, Robert. The guest house is always and completely yours." Her affection floated between the lines


Location 3779


	..."For a decade after the war," wrote close friend Jerry Bruner, now at Harvard, "Ruth Tolman played an incomparable role in holding together her friends--psychologists, psychoanalysts and physicists from all over the world. She did so whether at her home in Pasadena, or whether visiting in Berkeley, in Cambridge, in Princeton at the Oppenheimers', wherever." She was, he wrote, "the perfect confidante, a wise woman. It is difficult for me to separate what is personal from what is 'profession' or intellectual about Ruth. And that, of course was part of her genius." Robert may have been Ruth's favoriate correspondent, but he was far from her only one.


Ruth got her own con going?

Ruth worked for OSS and someone destroyed her letters later


Location 3969

	
	...Later, when it became clear that psychology as a science based on proven theories had far to go, she would admit that perhaps she had "wanted too clear and orderly and rich a body of theory to emerge."


Ruth contribute to any psueoscience? worth looking into


Location 3980


	..."I have needed terribly your help over these days of trying to decide. It is ironic to say that I have missed Richard's wisdom just excruciatingly, for if he were here there could be no such conflict and no such invitation. And just the occurence of the issue, of course, has made so sharp and vivid my present unwanted 'freedom' and rudderlessness." Ruth said the thought of leaving Pasadena filled her with sadness. She ended with, "Remember how we have always, both of us, been miserable when we had to look more than a week ahead?"


may Oppenheimer a "white knight" type and they tried to play to that? from above: "Richard Rhodes describes Kitty Oppenheimer as a passionate woman who presented herself as someone who needed saving. “Robert jumped in like the white knight that he…wanted to be.”"

Ruth doing same thing here, saying she's sad without her husband and needs Oppenheimer's help


	...The growing intensity of their relationship is captured in the few letters from Ruth saved by Robert. "I look back on your wonderful week here with all my heart greateful, Dear. It was unforgettable. I'd give great rewards even for another day. In the meantime, you know the love and tenderness I send."


why was their relationship growing in intensity? authors say Oppenheimer was determined to influence nuclear policy around this time. What else was going on?

another obvious thing going on: Ruth's husband died (sep 5 1948)


Location 4052

	"...I suppose you realized what I did not have to mention--that it was the anniversary--four years--of Richard's death, and the memories of those dreadful days of 1948, and then of many earlier sweet ones were very overwhelming to me. I feel very grateful that I could be with you that night. My love Robert, and again my thanks. Ruth"

	After four years, the pain of Richard's death was still vivid. Ruth continued to need Robert's comfort and Robert, who had also loved Richard, could understand.



Location 4074:  April 1953, Ruth's letters to Oppenheimer seemed more stressed. She "nudged him, agian" to send suggestions on the draft of an address she was going to deliver to a psychology association. Wanted to make psychology more scientific and Oppenheimer helped. Paper got published in American Psychologist


Location 4096: Ruth has heart attack, Oppenheimer wants to visit but no visitors allowed, August 21 1953 writes more warm letters saying "so wonderful to hear your voice yesterday" and "want to reassure you ... so that no anxiety about my health will influence you to do anything that is strenuous for you."


Loction 4639

	
	...September 18, 1957, the day that Ruth Tolman died.

	...Ruth was sixty-four; ...It is not known if Robert visited her grave, or how or wehre he said goodbye. That he did grieve is without question; Robert's love for Ruth had endured for almost thirty years. Aunt Hedwig understood how deeply the loss of his true best friend would hurt.


	...It is easy to image Robert walking those winter woods, his heart heavy at the loss of Ruth, as he had once mourned Jean in the snow-covered mountains rising above Los Alamos.


how did he take it?


could see why he liked her friendship, at least at first--an always caring psychologist friend to talk to while he had a crazy drunk wife


------


location 3903 in "Atomic Love Story"


	Robert, now determined to introduce a strong humanities strain to the Institute, brought in poet and soon-to-be Nobel Laureate T. S. Eliot, historian Arnold Toynbee, theologian Reinhold Niebuhr, social philosopher Isaiah Berlin, among others. For Kitty, an even more impressive group that showed up at the Manor was the Washington Establishment: James Conant was president of harvard, David Lilienthal was chairman of the Atomic Energy Commission, and Vannevar Bush, president of the Carnagei Institution. George Kennan, a diplomat at the State Department, would become Robert's close friend. Though Kitty seldom wnet to Washington with Robert, or to New York when it involved government business, he often asked her opinions and sometimes took her advice.


people Oppenheimer associated with 

"close friends" with Kennan

what's up with last line? did Kitty advise Oppenheimer on his associates?

authors hint at Kitty trying to use Oppenheimer to get close to certain people in Washington, while she knew FBI was spying on her. 



Location 3912

June 7, 1949 Oppenheimer testified before HUAC about spying at Berkely radiation lab. He named some people (including Bernard Peters) and physicist Hans Bethe was angry. Frank O was also angry. Frank was called but decided not to name anybody.


his "security clearence" hearing where he got taken down was in 1953


------


Location 3998 of "Atomic Love Story"

authors present HUAC red scare and McCarthy spy hunt as consequence of Soveits detonating Atomic Bomb

makes sense, since people would be wondering how the Soviets developed the bomb so fast

authors say "After Joe-1, the "Super Bomb" was promoted as insuring American atomic superiority"


Location 4041

	...In the spring of 1952, the FBI asked to interview Kitty. Robert insisted on being there, probably to protect both of them from her acid tongue and perhaps to make sure their stories of certain incidents were the same. For two days in March, and another two in April, the agents asked Kitty the same questions she had been asked before She gave all the same answers. About Joe Dallet, about her membership in the Communist Party, how she had given up the Party but not all of her old friends, at least not right away. I twas a rehersal and she was proving to have talent as a witness.


How long was FBI investigating people around Oppenheimer? would make sense to do once they learned of soviets stealing bomb



Location 4063

	...In Feburary of 1953, the members of the Psychology Committee were meeting at the Institute, and were to have dinner and drinks at Olden Manor. Robert was in Washington, standing by as a possible witness in the perjury trial of one of his former graduate students at Berkely, Joe Wienberg. (Like Frank, Joe had been dismissed from the University of Minnesota two years before, another HUAC victim.) Kitty was in Washington with Robert. It was obvious to their friends that no matter how difficult she could be, Robert had come to depend on her in the turmoil created by a frightened and irrational nation.


Oppenheimer was possible witness for perjury trials of one of his grad students, Joe Wienberg, in Feb 1953



Location 4108:

	[By Fall 1953] ... He and Kitty went to London for three weeks, then to Copenhagen for three days to visit Bohr, and finally to Paris to have dinner with Haakon Chavalier and his new wife at their apartment at the foot of Sacre-Coeur. It had been three years since the friends had seen each other; the meeting was, Chevalier would report, as warm as ever, and he opened a bottle of champagne so they could make a series of toasts: "to the health and well-being of all os us, to our long friendship, to the future." Kitty suggested she and Robert sign their names on the cork, as a remembrance. So ended what Chevalier would remember as "a happy reunion and for me a rather fabulous one." He made no comment when Robert indicated, as he said goodbye, that he thought the coming months would be stormy.


authors say what Haakon thought--what did Oppenheimer think.

Kitty wanted to sign a cork... did Oppenheimer think that was a good idea?


	Strauss had inserted himself into the happy reunion by ensuring someone from the American Embassy would copy all the phone calls the oppenheimers made from their room in the elegant George V Hotel, and that Robert would be followed wherever he went. The agents reported that the couple had seen Chevalier, whom French intelligence had on a watch list, suspected of being a Soviet agent.


What if Oppenheimer had become an FBI informant? he was caught lying to them and was willing to testify on communist agents around him before. That could also explain the takedown of him at his "security clearance" hearing.


had same theory about Alger Hiss

a little shaky, something like that hard to reason about without more details

but can reason this: seems clear that Oppenheimer would suspect his "friend" Haakon of being a Soviet agent and grew to resent him. And he did eventually give his name to the FBI. So that already makes him an FBI informant. Worth speculating what else he might have done for them.


Location 4142:


	...In April, President Eisenhower had issued an executive order for anyone whose files contained any derogatory information. Strauss built to the big news: a former government official had questioned Robert's security clearance and President Eisenhower had ordered an investigation. Strauss went on, there was going to be a "review," which meant an immediate suspension of his security clearance. Robert listened, quietly asked pertinent questions. Nichols took notes. Strauss continued, the Commission had prepared a draft of the charges against Robert, but it had not yet been signed. He could read the charges right there, right then, but he could not take the draft with him. Robert noted that it was the same mix of charges brought before, some true both others clearly skewed to make him look guilty. Still others simply wrong.

	Robert was to be given a choice. His tenure as a General Advisory Committee consultant was about to expire; he could walk away, as Strauss would prefer. Or he could challenge the government and then go before a special panel and undergo an administrative review. And i was Strauss who would choose the three members of the panel. The Admiral demanded a response that night; he would be at home by 8 P.M., he said, so Robert was to answer anytime after that.


could also be the reason: they just wanted him out of atomic politics


authors say Oppenheimer couldn't make up his mind at first, then went to talk to Kitty. Did she convince him to challenge the decision?

says Robert took a bunch of Kitty's sleeping pills after decision and was unconcious


Location 4185: Oppenheimer rehersed his story to people, so I guess Soviet spies would have picked up on it. He went over it with Kitty who was "involved in making decisions" (what decisions?)

Location 4198 says Kitty was asking Acheson and General Groves what they intended to say

a bit on Hobson his secretary pushing him to "attack" his opponents. Book says

	...Robert's secretaries were bright, educated women with young families of their own, but they were devoted to Robert. Kay Russel had been his secretary for seven years. "The Oppenheimers *became* her life," Hobson expalained, "He expected you to be around and willing to work all kinds of funny hours but it was not that he said now you must be here, it was just the atmosphere . . . you wanted to because you could see it was important." Hobson and Russel were part of a long line of secretaries who became mesmerized by their boss, but it was Kitty who became dependent on them. They did most of the planning for the social functions Kitty was expected to host. And sometimes they drank with her late in the afternoon. They also rescued her more than a few times from her accidents. Hobson would say, "What a strange person she was: all that fury and soreness and intelligence and wit. She had a constant state of the hives."


anything wierd going on with Oppenheimer's secretaries? reminds me of what is written about Trump's secretaries


Location 4221

Robert didn't contact Ruth for awhile after her heart attacks in summer 1953. Phoned her in April 1954. She wrote she was "deeply troubled" by his silence. "I think there has never been a time when so long a period has elapsed without letters or visits or some kind of communication for us."

she wrote to him:

	"I suppose you have felt too harrased and confused to write . . . and I was a little confused, too because I did not know how much I was 'supposed' to know--though surely I could have assumed that you were willing for me to know anything which Bob and Charlier told me. You have been constantly in my thoughts Dear, and with, of course, much concern . . . Oh Robert, Robert, how often has it been this way for us! That we have felt powerless to help when we wanted to so deeply."


kindof like Haakon, Ruth not doing him any favors by putting this in writing

after their relationship "intensifying" and her having a heart attack, why hadn't he contacted her for almost a year?


Location 4254: FBI had wiretaps of Oppenheimer's house in Washington, where his defense team met to discuss strategy. says Hoover didn't want hearing to be a trial since wiretap info would be ruled illegal. 


Location 4266: Ernest Lawrence phoned Strauss a rumor that Oppenheimer seduced Ruth while she was still with Richard and Richard "died of a broken heart." Strauss told other people the rumor.

authors say Ruth had no idea of the rumors, posits Lawrence got idea from Gloria Gantz, friend of Ruth, on relationship between Ruth and Robert

in this telling rumor goes from Ruth to Gantz to Lawrence to Struass--a game of telephone?


Location 4356: Kitty's testimony paints her as just a groupie for Joe Dallet, doing some "office work" for the Communist party

relying on bigotry to get away with spying? in the 50's it might be easy to convince people to write someone like Kitty off as just doing office work without really thinking about it and following her husband

her testimony relies on assigning her less agency, contradicting description of her character in this book and other sources 


	...Her association with Steve Nelson was certain to come up. At that moment, he was in jail charged with attempting to overthrow the government and was awaiting trial. The plan was to describe Nelson as a kind friend who took care of Kitty in the difficult weeks after Joe was killed in Spain. When asked why Nelson was invited to their home in Berkeley Kitty explained: We had a picnic lunch . . . We talked about the old days, family matters.

	On the delicate matter of her own membership, Kitty was asked when she left the Party. In 1936, she answered, when she left Youngstown. She conveniently left out her plans to join Joe in Spain. Had she paid any dues since? No. How would she describe her current views on Communism? Very strongly against.


sounds like Kitty lied...

did she do anything to make Oppenheimer look more guilty? worth reading her testimony. authors point to bits where she refuses to answer and "I don't like your phrasing" when asked questions about Oppenheimer's ties to Communism, which could make him look more guilty.


Location 4424: had fights with Kitty afterward when visiting Virgin Islands. Visited by FBI when he came back.


Location 4447: Ruth and Oppenheimer resumed contact in 1954, trying to meet as much as they could in person


Location 4469: Kitty gets more drunk and angry and careless after hearing, author postits because she lost access to powerful people and no longer able to do important things after that. At one point burned bed with ciggarettes which made news in NY times.


Location 4480:

	...In an attempt to explain Kitty, Robert looked for answers in the psychoanalytic theory that had so fascinated him. He told Hobson, "Kitty had some confusions about her own sex and perhaps . . . [had] some resentment toward a male." Her confusions were not about her sexuality, but rather her view of herself as superior to some of the men around her, when she was consistently treated as inferior. Francis Fergusson, Robert's old friend who would spend two terms at the Insitute, agreed that as much as Kitty worried about Robert, she "had this repressed hostility toward him."


sexism turned her into a man-hater?

she exploited sexism to get away with communist activities in the hearing, which I guess would require her to believe others had sexist attitudes if she thought it would work.

Kitty had sociopathic tendencies, and they tend to believe they are superior to others. Believing that while constantly having people understimate you would probably get someone very angry and resentful, so it would be easy to get someone like that to be sexist in the other direction. Suspect this is the ideological basis for recuirting many women to be spies and getting them to spy on or manipulate men they are in relationships with.


	Others confirmed that Kitty was intensely jealous of Robert, so much so that she could stand neither to see him praised or blamed. It was as if she were caught up in the need to *be* Robert--to live, as ever, through a man.



------

Location 4548:

book weird about Oppenheimer's interaction with 16 year old Lynn Alexander, who was Carl Sagan's girlfriend 

Alexander's writings didn't help the situation


Location 4582: Ruth "needs" Oppenheimer again after her sister died

Location 4582: Kitty's quasi-Nazi mother dissappears from a ship into the Sea on April 26, 1956. newspapers run stories of her mysterious dissappearance.


Location 4605: harvard invites Oppenheimer to give lecture on ethics and philosophy in 1957

Location 4617: "Whenever Robert Agreed to An interview with the news media, it was with the proviso that the Hearing was taboo"

says gave interview midway through 1957 on the hearing and "clearly wanted to address all those who insisted the Hearing had destroyed him and that he was a shadow of his former self. The substance of the Tribune article had Ruth's imprimatur all over it."

Location 4714: cites a "Katherine Page" as being transformative to Oppenheimer somehow

Location 4714: says someone tempted Oppeneheimer into being gay, but later became a cowboy (?)


...


Location 4748: "Ruth Tolman had been Robert's lodestar"

most important influence on Oppenheimer?


authors argue they weren't banging and Ruth just liked to write like that (what about when both said to be found in nightgowns together?)


	...Ruth might have destroyed Robert's letters because they would affirm an affair, but it is just as likely it was because he wrote in confidence about people they knew, and the letters, if made public, could hurt feelings or damage reputations.


Ruth destroyed Oppenheimer letters, author posits it was because info in them could damage mutual friends but also raises "it was because they were banging" theory

	
	..."Robert did not get close to many people," he offered, then attempted to expalin what made Ruth so exceptional. She had, he says, the ability to "think inside your head" which, combined with an exceptional degree of empathy, made her an extraordinary confidente.



...


Location 4906: Kitty remarries Serber, author says pushing him to rise politically, says he's "under the influence of Kitty Oppenheimer"


	..."She'd been a beautiful girl," Serber said, but "then that terrible auto accidnet . . . her face was all bashed up." He had rushed back to New York and there had been plastic surgery, but after that, he said, "she looked her age." She was fifty-nine.


Serber's wife suicide, then this, anything going on? maybe don't want to know...

author goes on to say she was supposed to write an Oppenheimer biography but screwed around drinking and smoking cigarretes all night instead

later died from intestinal infection at 62 (interesting author mentioning her stomach pains throughout the book)


choice of wording weird for these last sections on Kitty


...


location 4984:

	...Had this book been fiction, we would have left Herb and Anne together longer, and we would not have allowed so many suicide. We would have saved Jean (perhaps by setting the story in the twenty-first century, when science has found some of the answers to the depression from which she suffered), and bright and funny Charlotte Serber, who cound't face the ravages of Parkinson's disease. We would have wished an easier death for Kitty's mother. And for Kitty. Toni Oppenheimer deserved a longer life; she hanged herself in the family beach house on St. John in January of 1977. By then, she had been twice married and twice divocred. As her friend Fiona St. Clair said, Tona "could not find her path." The girl her mother had once described as "one of those girls who is so unfortunate as to want to do good," left a note offering the beach house to the people of St. John as a community center.


As if they can write history as a fiction novel... who are these people?


	...Jean's passionate, precious adolescent letters allowed us to watch her grow and flower and to feel, amost seventy years after her death, the loss of such talent and promise. Although Ruth lived a full life, when she died our feelings mirrored those of her friends; even from the distances of decades, her empathy and grace endeared her to us. Kitty remained for us, as for most of the people who knew her, and enigma: Brith, frustrated, capable of erratic kindesses and frequent cruelties, she was the epitome of a life unfulfilled.

	Until the end of his life, Robert remained loyal to these women. He steadfastly treated the memory of Jean and Ruth with respect. For the duration of his marriage, he remained, in some profound way, deeply committed to his wife. Each of the three in her turn helped shape his chracter, read poetry with him, opened doors to new worlds for him, took risks and lauged and etertained with him, encouraged and conforted him. They gave companionship and friendship, most of all, the love that Robert Oppenheimer, aloof and arrogant though he could be, needed as much as any man.


is this a biography or a KGB report?

comes off as a "lessons learned" thing, especially last section.

to take a guess: authors would prefer not to assassinate so many of their agents (particular using depression as an excuse in 21st century), particularly Jean which they saw as having "promise."

could imagine this being written by Claudia from "The Americans" or something


...


clearly these three had a lot of influence over Oppenheimer


Oppenheimer comes off as having a "white knight" complex, and that could be a way they figured they could get to him--come to visit Jean because she said she was seeing a psychiatrist, needed help and she "still loved him," Ruth would keep sending him letters to that effect, and he would psychoanalyze Kitty and be surprisingly tolerant of her behavior, as if he thought he could "fix" her. Apparently he could not "fix" her, although it sounds like she was happier with him and started to deteriorate even more after his death.

It is clear that whatever influence they had over Oppenheimer diminished over the course of his life--he started out in secret Communist meetings, but eventually would write that he came to understand Communism as more heavily penetrated by Russian espionage than he realized; this is also reflected in his evolving relationship with Chevalier and (maybe) Ruth. Particularly, with Chevalier he went from defending him even from FBI interrogations to trying to legally bar him from publishing his book on his ties to Communists. Similarly, Oppenheimer went from donating to Communist fronts in his early years to giving actionable testimony on suspected Soviet agents to Congress and being called to do so in court. It appears that Oppenheimer slowly learned he was surrounded by Soviet agents, and not all of his "friends" could be trusted.

If they had a lot of influence and control over him early on (think Trump, maybe not that much...) this is damming, since Oppenheimer would tell other scientists on the Manhatten project not to worry about ethical problems with developing the bomb. As their influence diminished, Oppenheimer involved himself in U.S. nuclear policy and spoke out against the development of more powerful bombs. For this and other reasons he was essentially put on trial, humiliated and stripped of his clearence and influence in U.S. nuclear policy.

While the degree of influence over Oppenheimer can be inferred from a solid basis, what exactly they influenced him to do is left a mystery. Both Ruth and Jean's letters were destroyed, and all three women died before their time. Whatever they told Oppenheimer, it looks like someone thought it was worth risking a lot and even looking suspicious to keep it secret.



In one sense, that the United States developed the atomic bomb and became the only country to use it was a propaganda win for the Soviets. This might explain motive, or could serve as a satisfactory explanation for agents most heavily involved in active measures that led to the U.S. developing the bomb (other things to look at: Einstein's involvement with Soviets and his letter warning of an atomic race with Germany, whether the "atomic race" with Germany was real and why people believed it was, actions of certain members of FDR's government in relation to the Manhattan project, subsequent propaganda that made Americans more enthusiastic or proud of the bomb a la Dr. Strangelove).

Taking the Soviet's history in sum, however, points to darker motives, perhaps in certain circles of Soviet policy. Stalin's nuclear paranoia and almost starting a nuclear war around the time of the "doctor's plot", KGB efforts to provide nuclear weapons to unstable countries or terrorists, and efforts in China (including Lin Bao) to paint the U.S. as a "paper tiger" that would fold in response to nuclear aggression should be further explored.